 And we've now got mice that are four months old,
 Dr . Ehud Ur,
 Like some other experts, he was skeptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, and pointed out that the findings were of no significance for people who were already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy,
 Danius said,
 The company was founded by Jamie Siminoff,
 He said he had built a WLAN doorbell.
 Siminoff said that sales had increased after his appearance on the show in 2013, although the show's panel had rejected the financing of his start-up.
 At the end of 2017, Siminoff appeared on the Teleshopping channel, QVC.
 Ring has also settled a lawsuit with the competing security firm ADT Corporation.
 While an experimental vaccine seems to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, there are no drugs that have been proven to be clearly suitable for the treatment of existing infections.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp,
 In the PALM study, ZMapp was used as a control,
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts it as an absolute necessity for the Olympic family to stand up for a safe and healthy environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that it is in the best interest of our athletes, our clubs and our sport to make meaningful changes within our organization rather than to decertify.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could bring to light how abuse of the magnitude that has been so bravely described by the survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone unchecked for so long, and welcomes any and all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal of making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for our athletes so they can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowered environment.
 During the 1960s,
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy and then served from 1977 to 1981 as national security advisor,
 As a national security advisor, he supported Carter in the diplomatic handling of world affairs such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the Iran hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The movie with Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone has received nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and stone were nominated as best actor and best actress.
 There are also nominations for best film,
 Two songs from the movie, Audition and City of stars, got nominations for the best original song. Lionsgate studio got twenty six nominations, more than any other film studio.
 On the late Sunday,
 The announcement came after a phone call from Trump to Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would carry out the surveillance of the more hardened ISIS fighters, whose return to European countries had been refused.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers,
 Scientists say that the feathers on the top of this bird were chestnut-brown,
 The Fund also gives insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Weil the dinosaur feathers have no well-developed shaft, which is called the rachis, but have other features of feathers,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight,
 The researchers claimed, although this is the tail of a young dinosaur,
 A car bomb detonated this morning at the Turkish police headquarters in Gaziantep, killing two police officers and wounding over twenty other people.
 According to the governor's office,
 The police said they suspected a militant supporter of Daesh.
 You have found out that the sun,
 To determine the Rossby number of a Star,
 The smaller the Rossby number,
 During the voyage, Iwasaki encountered many difficulties.
 He was robbed by Pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet,
 The 802.11n standard runs on the frequencies 2.4 GHz and 5 GHz.
 Through this, it can be downward compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual-radio.
 The speed of 802.11 n is significantly faster than that of the predecessors, which had a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, married and with two grown children,
 And Miller said,
 We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 to a level significantly lower than that of 2005.
 He did not give a number, but said it would be based on the performance of the Chinese economy.
 Hu ermutigte Entwicklungsländer,
 However, he added,
 The study group on Iraq presented its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 No one can guarantee that any course of action in Iraq at this point will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or a slide into chaos.
 The report starts with a call for an open discussion and consensus building in the USA on a strategy for the Middle East.
 The report is extremely critical of almost every aspect of the current executive policy on Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to reestablish diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Senator and Argentine First Lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for President last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 As a member of the Argentinean Parliament,
 And the controversy was,
 The criticism of the liberals on the reconstruction process has focused on the fact that contracts for the reconstruction were given to alleged insiders in Washington.
 More than four million people came to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of participants was so great,
 Several large television screens were set up at various locations in Rome, so that people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar facilities were installed, which were seen by many people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's earlier policy of concentrating its resources on what they considered to be easy cases,
 The Congress began in August 2005 with the financing of the anti-Obscenity initiative and established that the FBI must deploy 10 agents for the adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa reached the highest point of the innings, 70 points, with only 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The leaders of the middle row, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, showed good performance and achieved a partnership with 100 runs.
 But after the loss of the captain's wicket, India scored only 36 runs and lost 7 wickets,
 The U S . President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November sixteen,
 He was greeted by Wong Kan Seng, the deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and spoke with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore, about trade and terrorism.
 After a week of losses in the midterm elections,
 Premier Stephen Harper has agreed to send the clean air act to a committee of all parties for review before the second reading.
 Layton had during the meeting with the Prime Minister demanded changes to the Conservative's environmental law, and had called for a, quote,
 After the Federal Government had taken over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some members of the state parliament criticised the move as a PR stunt in the lead-up to the Federal election in November.
 Premier John Howard said, however, the measure, providing 45 million Australian dollars, was only to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading the hospitals.
 According to the current bulletin,
 There were no significant damage or injuries reported from Tonga.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii,
 President George W . Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe,
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, which was given the name Subtropical Storm Jerry, has formed today in the Atlantic ocean.
 At this point,
 The American engineer Corps estimated that 6 inches of rain could cause the already damaged dams to break.
 The Ninth Ward, which was flooded up to twenty feet during Hurricane Katrina, is currently experiencing a twenty-foot flood.
 On a 100 foot long section,
 The Commons-Administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disappointment with the distances,
 Um so to speak,
 The Irritations in the community led to the current efforts to draft a policy regarding sexual content for the Website, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work was largely theoretical,
 The effect, after the team sought, would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 Exactly as the moon draws the earth and causes the tides,
 The scientists came to the conclusion that dark matter acts on other dark matter in the same way that normal matter acts on normal matter.
 This theory says that the largest part of the dark matter is in a kind of halo around a Galaxy, and it's made up of many small particles.
 Television reports show that white smoke is coming out of the plant.
 The local authorities are urging residents near the plant to stay indoors,
 According to the nuclear authority of Japan,
 The authorities speculate that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel at the site could have been torn open and are possibly leaking.
 The extremely drug-resistant TB,
 And he said,
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital,
 Within a year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Despite this, the proportion of XDR-TB amongst all the people with TB is still low,
 The two satellites, which weighed more than 1,000 pounds, collided 491 miles above the earth at an approximate speed of 17,500 miles per hour.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 You're still trying to figure out how extensive the collision was and how the earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the United States Department of defense finds the wreckage.
 The outcome of the plotting analysis will be published on a public Website.
 A nurse who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is being charged with the murder of her mother, who was found dead in the trunk of her car in Ohio.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground beside the road in T-shirt and underwear,
 She led the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blood-soaked sheets.
 The police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported in late July.
 The disease is transferred from the pigs to the mosquitoes,
 The outbreak of the disease led the Indian government to hire swine catchers, to distribute thousands of mosquito nets, and to spray plant protection materials.
 The government has also promised several million vials of vaccine against brain inflammation, which will help the health authorities to be wary for the next year.
 Plans for vaccines, which should have been delivered this year to the historically hardest hit areas,
 In the year 1956,
 He made over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 The quality and precision of his work are so highly regarded that his name is one of the very few generally known names in the field of philately.
 His one thousandth stamp, from the year 2000,
 He was also involved in the design of the Canadian five and one hundred dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to a nearby hospital,
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 A person who worked in a workshop near the scene of the accident said,
 They all ran back to the scene of the accident.
 More items on the agenda in Bali are the rescue of the world's remaining forests and the joint use of technologies that are supposed to help developing countries grow in a less environmentally damaging way.
 The United Nations,
 The means could be used for flood-proof houses,
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some women who wanted to speak out about women's health were being drowned out.
 To this conclusion she came as a result of the numerous positive comments and the encouragement she received from both men and women who urged that contraceptives should be regarded as a medical necessity.
 As the fighting stopped after the transport of the wounded to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed on the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 The negotiators tried to defuse the situation, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 11:00 PM MDT,
 The police then entered the building.
 The firefighters were able to put out the fire at 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the annual floods, which distribute sediments in the river, came to a halt.
 This sediment was necessary to form sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 Two fish species have become extinct,
 The authorities hope that the rise in water level after the flood will be enough to restore eroded sandbanks downstream, although it is only a few feet.
 No Tsunami warning was issued, and according to the Geophysics Department of Jakarta, there will be no Tsunami warning, as the earthquake did not reach the necessary magnitude of 6.5.
 Although there was no tsunami danger,
 Although Winfrey shed tears at her farewell,
 This will not be a farewell.
 The results of the Presidential and Parliamentary elections in Namibia have indicated that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was re-elected by a wide margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation,
 Troops of the coalition and Afghan troops rushed into the area to secure the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to support.
 The crash occurred high up in mountainous terrain, and it is suspected that it was the result of enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 This is the worst outbreak that's been recorded in the country.
 And he said,
 The games started at 10:00 am in great weather and apart from some drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared, it was an ideal day for 7s Rugby.
 South Africa, the top-ranked team,
 Although the team definitely rusted against their Southern sisters,
 Your disciplined defense, ball control and excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team that had to be defeated.
 Officials of the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum say that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a danger to public health,
 He would have been dismissed on Tuesday,
 All of the caves, also called the seven sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show temperature differences between night and day, which indicate that these are probably caves.
 And they're colder than the surrounding surface.
 So it's not just a matter of,
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech affair.
 After the officials have verified the identity of the voter,
 The French election law lays out the process quite strictly.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no ballot envelopes are present at the beginning of the election and that no ballot envelopes are added except those of the properly counted and authorized voters.
 The candidates can send representatives who can witness every part of the process.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously brought to the market based on Spar- and Functionality-Factors, became the hot topic at the Taipei IT Month.
 But the consumer market for laptop computers will be radically changed after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by manager Yuan from the Republic of China.
 The Website of the broadcaster describes the show as,
 In their early days, the show was only broadcast on the old-school Internet radio station TogiNet radio,
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet founded the AstroNet Radio branch.
 The show originally featured local amateur synchronized swimmers from East Texas.
 According to reports,
 And more and more,
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the demonstrators from the South for the lawlessness.
 South Africa has defeated the All Blacks in a Rugby Union match in the three nation tournament at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a win with a one point lead of 21 to 20, which ended the All Blacks' winning streak of 15 games.
 For the Springboks ended a five-game losing streak.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks,
 The final of the tournament will be played next week in the Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will play against Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana on Monday at 22:08.
 No immediate reports of damage were received by the United States Geological Survey and the National earthquake information center.
 The center of the earthquake was about 20 kilometers north-northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the bird flu H5N1, which is deadly to humans, has infected a wild duck that was found dead on Monday in a marshy area near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country of the European Union to be hit by the virus.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for the death,
 Chambers, an Agnostic, argues that his suit was frivolous,
 The story, which is presented in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saens,
 Therefore, the actors on the stage smoke cannabis joints, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 The former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich,
 After the results, Gingrich praised Santorum,
 He said, quote,
 Bachmann, who won the Ames-Stampede poll in August,
 The photographer was brought to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he subsequently died.
 In a statement, Bieber said,
 The photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard,
 The driver of the vehicle,
 So it's not just a question of,
 To that list belong the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen placed ninth yesterday in the super-G, and Finland with Katja Saarinen, who placed tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was eleventh in the standing Super-G.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez came in as the fifteenth in the super G.
 The visually impaired Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in the Super-G in the thirteenth place.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake of 2010, are being blamed for the spread of the disease, which broke out near the troops' camp.
 The complaint alleges that the waste from the UN camp was not properly cleaned, which led to bacteria entering the Artibonit River, one of the largest rivers in Haiti.
 Before the arrival of the troops,
 The Haitian Institute for justice and democracy has pointed to independent studies that suggest the Nepalese UN peacekeeping force may have brought the disease unwittingly to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease,
 Hamilton bestätigte, that the Howard University hospital had taken in the patient in a stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria,
 The hospital followed protocols for infection control, including the separation of the patient from others to prevent infection of third parties.
 Before the Simpsons,
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like taxi,
 1989, half er Brooks and Groening created the Simpsons and were responsible for the hiring of the first author team of the show.
 Although he left the show in 1993,
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua reported the planned hijacking of an airplane.
 Later reports then said the plane had received a bomb threat and had been diverted to Kandahar, where it landed.
 First reports say the plane was diverted to Urumqi after it was refused permission to land.
 Accidents are frequent in Iran, which has an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military use.
 International sanctions have made it impossible to buy new planes.
 At the beginning of the week, three people were killed and three others were injured.
 Last month, Iran suffered its worst airplane disaster in years,
 In the same month, a further passenger plane,
 Aerosmith have canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was supposed to tour through the United States and Canada.
 After the front singer Steven Tyler injured himself during a fall from the stage on August 5, they have canceled the tour.
 Murray lost the first set in the tiebreak after both men had held every single service game.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but a tie break was required after the score reached 6:6.
 Potros Schulter was in the meantime treated,
 The program began at 20:30 local time.
 Famous singers from all over the land,
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakkha Singh took over the leadership of the Bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 Teller Chhappan Bhog.
 Lakkha Singh presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan.
 At the Tokyo Game Show keynote presentation on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the Controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution Console.
 Like a TV remote control,
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in Video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and had to retire shortly after the start.
 His teammate led the most of the race, but ended it shortly after his pit stop, probably because of a badly jammed right front tire.
 Shortly after Alonso, Michael also ended his race due to damage to the wheel suspension from the numerous fights during the race.
 And he said,
 I was very much moved.
 About 3 minutes after takeoff,
 But people don't assume that.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr.,
 After five minutes, the wind came up, about a minute later, the wind reached 70 km/h.
 And I'm like,
 The NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported that the earthquake had no effect, and that reactors number one and two of the Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 It is reported that about 9,400 houses in the region have no water and about 100 have no electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and the railway service in the affected areas was disrupted.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office.
 Three more bombs detonated within two hours of government buildings.
 According to some reports,
 Both Cyanuric acid and Melamine were found in urine samples from pets that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The two connections react with each other and form crystals, which can, according to the researchers of the University,
 The researchers discovered crystals in the cat's urine that had formed through the addition of Melamine and Cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to the composition found in the urine of affected animals when they are compared by means of infrared spectroscopy.
 I don't know if you knew, but most goods from Central America came in to our country duty-free.
 Eighty percent of our goods were taxed in Central American countries.
 That seemed not to be the case.
 I only say to the people,
 The California governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill into law that bans the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The proposed law would require that in the state of California,
 The director of the CPS, Kier Starmer,
 Huhne is stepping down and will be replaced in the cabinet by the MP Ed Davey. It is expected that the MP Norman Lamb will take over the role of the business Secretary, which Davey is just vacating.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear in Westminster Magistrates Court on the 16th of February.
 The two dead were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21.
 Edgar Veguilla erlitt Wunden am Arm and the jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery for his face.
 The weapon of Uka had a safety, as he aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has been in chronic pain ever since, and is now blind in one eye, and has lost part of his skull.
 Schneider said of a Video call from a base of the us Air Force in his home country.
 Over the course of the week,
 In her first run, she received a DNF.
 Ihr anderes Rennen, den Riesenslalom, beendete sie with the 10th place in the women's group with a combined running time of 4:41,30. Damit was she 2:11,60 Minuten slower than the first-place Austrian Claudia Lösch and 1:09,02 Minutes faster than Gyöngyi Dani from Hungary, who placed ninth.
 Four skiers of the Krücken skiing came not into the goal, and 45 of the total of 117 skiers in the giant slalom could not place themselves.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh have found the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The deputy Inspector-General D. K. Arya said,
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanja, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The police chief, Chandra Shekhar Solanki,
 Although three people were in the house when the car crashed,
 The driver, however, suffered severe head injuries.
 The road on which the accident occurred was temporarily closed, while the rescue services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was first taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya was in the meantime charged with the murder of her son.
 She is in custody until the charges are brought and the trial is held,
 This is common practice in Britain,
 Professor Pamela Ferguson from the University of Dundee says,
 The Crown Prosecution Service, which is leading the prosecution, has indicated to journalists that it will not be making any further comments until the trial.
 The document refers to the border dispute, in which the Palestinians demand a return to the borders of the West Bank and the Gaza Strip prior to the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other topics that are supposedly covered include the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel wants a military presence in the Jordan Valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the Palestinian authority wants such a presence only for five years.
 The Schützen of the accompanying experiment to the end of the plague should be closely watched by the rankers,
 Within the framework of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn,
 Martelly has sworn in a new provisional electoral Council with nine members.
 It's Martelly's fifth CEP within four years.
 Last month, a Presidency Committee recommended the resignation of the previous Ceo as part of a package of measures to steer the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was Martelly's response to the widespread regime-critical protests that began in October.
 The trigger for the sometimes violent protests was the failure to hold elections, which had been scheduled for some time.
 Over 60 cases of Overheating have been reported,
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry,
 Last week, METI announced that it had been informed by apple of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company described as not being serious.
 The Ministry reacted by describing the delay as a real shame.
 The earthquake struck Mariana at 07:19 am local time.
 No damage was reported.
 Also, the Pacific Tsunami warning center had said there were no indications of a Tsunami.
 A former Philippine policeman has taken tourists from Hong Kong as hostages,
 Rolando Mendoza shot at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and there are at least six confirmed deaths.
 Six hostages, including the children and the elderly, were released early.
 The photographers took the place of an older lady,
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and became a medical doctor.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and took up a position at the National women's hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 During his work at the hospital,
 His research showed that the use of a hormone accelerated the maturation of the lungs.
 According to the report,
 And ringers also paid tribute to Luna.
 And then,
 Dustin „Goldust“ Runnels gave the following comment: „Luna was just as crazy as I was, maybe even crazier.
 Since 2008, the proportion of those who oppose Australia becoming a Republic has increased by 8 per cent.
 The then acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard,
 Forty four percent of Australians want Elizabeth to be the last.
 Twenty nine percent of those surveyed said Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible,
 The gold medallist at the Olympic games should swim at the Commonwealth games in the disciplines of 100 and 200 metres freestyle as well as in three relay events, but because of his many ailments his fitness was doubted.
 He was not able to take the medication he needed to overcome his pain, because it was banned at the Commonwealth games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 A lot of people confirmed the discovery using different hardware and software.
 Comets were possibly a source of water for the earth, along with organic matter that can form proteins and make life possible.
 So, for example,
 Cuomo, who took office earlier this year,
 He described the rumors as political nonsense and nonsense.
 It is speculated that he could run for the office of President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that the FAA claims would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel every year,
 It relies on satellite-based technology instead of the older technology based on ground radar, in order to enable air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more precisely and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transportation will be provided, and the surface trains will not stop at Wembley.
 With the concern about lacking transportation possibilities,
 A study published in the Journal Science on Thursday reported the emergence of a new bird species on the Ecuadorian Galápagos Islands.
 Researchers at Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species had developed within only two generations, although it had previously been thought that this process would take much longer due to the mating between a native Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and the introduced cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be processed into various forms.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be twisted and woven.
 It can be made very thin and stuck onto other metal.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical.
 The ink changes its color, depending on how sour or how alkaline the chemical is.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions in the tested chemicals.
 Hydrogen ions are protons to which electrons have been stripped.
 Mix the two dry powders together,
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels kind of weird,
 In almost every house,
 Remnants of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities on Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 In the Roman culture,
 When you call someone who's thousands of miles away,
 The satellite in space receives the call and then almost immediately reflects it back down to earth.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket.
 It takes a gigantic rocket,
 The wheel has changed the world in an incredible way.
 It has brought us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Among them are cats of medium size,
 There are also many small cats,
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche, a special task that each cat has and that ensures that it does not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social cats.
 The packs consist of one to three related adult males,
 Women usually have a close relationship with each other when they live in a large family with sisters and daughters.
 Like wolves or dogs,
 As a versatile athlete, the tiger can climb,
 The tiger belongs to the same group as lions, Leopards, and Jaguars.
 The roar of the tiger sounds not so much like the full-throated roar of the lion,
 Ocelots eat small animals. If they can, they will steal monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Ozelot,
 You can see in the dark with night vision,
 If a small group of living things,
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population needs different features or adaptations in order to be a strong competitor than what it used to be.
 The original population has not changed at all.
 With time, the new population begins to adapt to its new environment,
 After tens or even millions of years, two populations look so different that they can no longer be classified as the same species.
 This process is called speciation,
 Plants generate oxygen, which humans breathe in, and they take in the carbon dioxide that humans breathe out.
 Plants produce their food through Photosynthesis.
 We build our houses out of plants and make our clothes out of plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the largest predator of its time,
 His long fangs were equipped with more than seventy sharp teeth, plus a set of fangs on the palate, which meant that no animal could escape if it crossed his path.
 We don't know for sure, but he could have had a forked tongue.
 He also grabbed everything that came into the water,
 While the majority of their food was known,
 Another difference was that the poor people and the women ate their food sitting down,
 Dishes of the old Romans could contain no foods that came from America or Asia to Europe in later centuries.
 They had no maize, no tomatoes, no potatoes,
 The Babylonians built a temple to each of their gods,
 And the priests attempted to appease the gods by ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had an open courtyard,
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers,
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East,
 The largest part of the Hebrew family's life took place out of doors.
 The women cooked in the yard. Businesses consisted of open shops.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, so that wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. In the old Norse Sagas, it is said that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder. As he continued to travel West, he found Greenland and gave it the name Greenland.
 But independently of his discovery,
 Although all the countries were “Scandinavian”, there were many differences between the peoples, the Kings, the customs, and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie, the temple,
 That's not true.
 On the back of the Declaration of independence, the words,
 It is, however, known,
 It is also possible that the remark was added as a simple identification.
 The landing at D-Day and the fighting that followed liberated northern France, but the South was still not free.
 He was controlled by the Vichy French.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France.
 After only two weeks, the Americans and the French liberation troops had liberated the South of France and were heading towards Germany.
 A civilization is a distinctive culture,
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city state, and which also defines the size of a society.
 A civilized culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a continuing cultural footprint, and a proper distribution.
 Smaller cultures often disappear without leaving relevant historical records,
 During the revolutionary struggles,
 The Congress, however,
 He had no power to enact tax laws or to set tariffs.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all the states,
 The Italian national football team is, together with the German national football team, the second most successful national football team in the world.
 To the popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, Cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor racing.
 Winter sports are the most popular in the northern regions,
 Japan has about 7,000 Islands,
 Japan is often referred to as an Archipelago.
 The beginning of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors sailed past the island and documented its name as Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 1624, the Dutch East India company founded a settlement in the Southwest of Taiwan, thereby initiating a change in the rice and sugar plantation methods of the aboriginal people and employing Chinese workers on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In the year 1683, Qing dynasty forces,
 The Qing dynasty government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki,
 Machu Picchu consists mainly of three buildings, namely the Intihuatana, the sun temple, and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and the restoration work continues today.
 For example, the world's most widely used still image format is 35 mm, which corresponds to the predominant film size at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but even more importantly,
 Exactly,
 The page ratio of this format is twelve to sixteen.
 Many common formats, like the APS format family, for example,
 The much-discussed and often derided Drittel-Rule is a simple guideline that creates dynamism and at the same time preserves a measure of order in a picture.
 It says that the intersection point of the lines that divide a picture vertically and horizontally is the most effective place for the main motif.
 In this period of European history, the Catholic Church,
 For over a thousand years,
 His Omnipotence controlled every one, from the King to the peasant.
 One of the important Christian beliefs says that wealth should be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and that's exactly why the churches have money.
 For more than a thousand years,
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities,
 The strategy proved effective,
 Britain, however,
 Da the reaction to this tactic was limited,
 In the 1920s, pacifism and isolation were the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and countries.
 After the experience of the horrors and atrocities of the first World War,
 In the year eighteen eighty four,
 He came to the USA with four cents in his pocket, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 Each dynasty had its own name.
 Between the individual dynasties,
 In these times, bitter wars were fought among many lords,
 The time of the three kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China.
 There are a lot of social and political effects,
 Also, after the revolution, all professions were open to all male applicants, so that the most ambitious and the best could succeed.
 The same goes for the military,
 The French Revolution inspired many oppressed people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Mohammed was very interested in things that went beyond this everyday life. He often visited a cave that was known as Hira, on the mountain of Nur,
 The cave itself has outlived the times and offers a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 The cave is on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca,
 But it's not easy to find.
 Man sees nothing but the clear, beautiful sky,
 The Cheops pyramid is the only one of the seven world wonders, which still stands today.
 In the third century B.C.
 The Giza plateau, or Giza necropolis,
 The great pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops,
 The “Aufstrich” symbol looks like a V, and the “Abstrich” symbol looks like a Klammer or a square with the bottom line missing.
 So, if you're going to start at the top,
 The stroke generally generates a softer tone, while the stroke is stronger and more expressive.
 You can add your own pencil markings,
 The panicked King Louis the fourteenth,
 They traveled back to Paris, surrounded by a screaming mob of people,
 The mob forced the King and the queen to open the windows of their coaches wide.
 At some point,
 The war expenses of the U S . Imperialists in conquering the Philippines were borne by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime,
 Of course, the super profits,
 To understand the Templars,
 The epoch in which the events took place is commonly designated as the high Middle Ages, a period in European history that lasted from the eleventh to the thirteenth centuries.
 The early Middle Ages preceded the high Middle Ages, which were followed by the late Middle Ages, which ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas, from the technology push or the technological imperative, to the strict sense that human destiny is determined by an underlying logic that is associated with scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 The two general ideas shared by most Technological Determinists are that the development of technology follows a path that is largely beyond cultural or political influence, and that technology itself has effects on societies that are more inherent than social.
 One might argue that the automobile inevitably brings with it the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network is not economically viable for only a small number of cars.
 The widespread ownership of automobiles also leads to a higher number of accidents on the roads, which in turn leads to the invention of new techniques in the health care industry to repair damaged bodies.
 The romanticism had a strong, culturally deterministic element, which drew on writers like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, it is geography that formed individuals. With time, customs and cultures arose that related to this geography, and these, because they were in harmony with the place of society, were better than arbitrarily oktroyated laws.
 So, as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the world today,
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 A.D. and lasted until around 1100 A.D.
 His status declined in the course of the twelfth century, which was mainly due to the fact that the crusaders returned with gifts such as silk and spices, which were regarded as more valuable than the offerings of the Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the title of the fashion capital of the world also wandered from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its height between the 10th and 11th centuries.
 At the beginning, the clothing was strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture in the East.
 But in the West,
 At the end of the Middle Ages,
 Agriculture is the production of food,
 The subsistence economy is a simple, often biological, form of agriculture that uses saved, locally adapted seed and combines it with rotational crop systems or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 In the past, most farmers practiced subsistence farming,
 Subcultures bring like-minded people together who feel neglected by societal norms, and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished from other subcultures by age, ethnicity, class, location, and or gender.
 The characteristics that define a subculture as such may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, or geographic in nature, or a combination of these factors.
 The members of a Subculture often signal their membership through an unmistakable and symbolic style, which includes fashion, habits, and jargon.
 One of the most common methods of illustrating the importance of socialization is to rely on the few unfortunate cases of children who, because of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their childhood.
 Some of these children were kept by humans,
 Wolfskinder have possibly experienced massive childhood abuse or traumatic experiences before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some of them have been raised by animals.
 If it was completely raised by animals,
 While project-based learning makes the learning process easier and more interesting,
 Scaffolding is not a method of learning, but rather a support that helps individuals in a new learning situation, such as when using a new computer program or when beginning a new project.
 So Gerüsts can be virtual,
 Virtual assistance is built into the software and is supposed to question, suggest, and explain work steps that the student alone might not be able to accomplish.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse,
 No child should be forced to grow up in an environment that is not caring, loving, and education oriented, but many are.
 For us, the system of care is a piece of security for these kids.
 Our foster care system should provide a safe home, loving caregivers, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 The foster home should cover all the needs that they didn't get in the home that they were removed from.
 The Internet connects both elements of mass communication,
 The specificities of the Internet have led to additional dimensions in terms of the utility and reward approach.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as important motivations for Internet use.
 And these were identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord,
 The use of Video recordings led to important insights for the interpretation of Micro-Expressions,
 Especially it is claimed that one can recognize whether someone is lying by correctly interpreting minimal changes in the expression of the face.
 In his article, the President's speech, Oliver Sacks showed how people who can't understand language anymore,
 He even argues that the ability to interpret human behavior,
 There are two pools of genetic variation.
 Mutation creates new genetic Variations,
 Mixing and matching between the two pools with every generation.
 It is hard for a primate with a human-like digestive system to get its amino acids from the available plant sources.
 It has serious consequences if you don't.
 The most easily accessible plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes,
 In contrast to this, animal food sources, such as ants, termites, and eggs,
 Overall, it shouldn't surprise us that our own ancestors solved their protein problem in a similar way to how chimpanzees in the Savanna do today.
 The process of waking up during normal sleep periods and falling asleep shortly thereafter.
 This can be done by using a relatively quiet alarm clock,
 If you're someone who SETS the alarm,
 Another way to manipulate your biorhythm is to drink a lot of liquid before bed,
 The degree of inner calm,
 The less tension, the more positive the life force.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negativity.
 The Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha,
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple.
 With Kundalini-Yoga the Kundalini-Energy is awakened through Yoga-Poses, breathing exercises, Mantras and Visualisations.
 In the center of Tibetan meditation stands the deity yoga.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. After the war, the collision of the systems, the course and culture led to the countries becoming estranged.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 He should have lasted the next 40 years and in reality,
 On the seventeenth of September, 1939, the Polish defense had already collapsed, and the only hope was in a retreat and a new formation along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans, however, became obsolete almost overnight,
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient method of transporting large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The task of the Navy was traditionally to ensure that a country remains able to transport people and goods, and at the same time to hinder the enemy's ability to transport people and goods.
 One of the most important examples of this is the North Atlantic campaign during the second World War.
 At the same time, the German Navy tried to stop this traffic mainly with U-Boats.
 If the Allies had failed,
 Goats were apparently already domesticated in the Zagros mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 As soon as they began to use them as beasts of burden,
 The goats were usually kept in herds,
 Soon in the sixteen hundreds,
 Although the supporting rails consisted only of parallel wooden boards,
 Soon, however, it became clear that rails,
 This was usual, but the iron caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, the wooden rails were replaced by iron rails.
 The first known way of moving was walking.
 Your predecessors, the Australopithecus,
 Two-Toed species are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as seven million years ago.
 We can live in a more environmentally friendly way,
 But in many cases,
 It is really obvious that the world has changed a lot due to the scientific and technological advancements of humanity, and that the problems of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of humans have become much more serious.
 After his farewell address to the Congress,
 In the course of the night, between one hundred and two hundred copies were made,
 The first public reading of the document was given by John Nixon in the courtyard of Independence hall on July 8.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6,
 The 25 Dunlap-Broadside copies that still exist are the oldest copies that still exist.
 Many Paleontologists today believe that there is a group of dinosaurs that survived and are still living today.
 Many people don't see them as dinosaurs,
 But many things about birds still look like dinosaurs.
 They have feet with scales and claws,
 Almost all computers used today,
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, namely 0 or 1, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or Binary digits, to use the computer jargon.
 A hidden poisoning may not be immediately apparent. The symptoms, for example, vomiting, are so general that one cannot immediately make a diagnosis.
 The best sign of poisoning by swallowing is the presence of an open container with medicines or toxic household chemicals.
 Look on the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term “Wasps” is used by Entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from the ancient familiarity with bedbugs.
 Both the robber and the bed bug are nidicol,
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most widespread neurological disease in adults, young and middle-aged.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord, and the optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely to get MS as men.
 A couple can decide that it's not in their own interest or in the interest of their child to raise a baby.
 These couples can choose to adopt a baby.
 When a child is adopted,
 The main goal of science is to use the scientific method to figure out how the world works.
 It's not just about experimenting,
 Naturally,
 Aristotle's views on all branches of knowledge, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the loss of Greek language,
 Many observed rhythms in physiology and behavior often depend to a large extent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 From a cycle,
 Biological clocks are self-contained oscillators that even in the absence of external signals will continue to oscillate for a time.
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the defining pieces of evidence that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used Phages or viruses,
 They did two experiments,
 Mutations can have a variety of effects, depending on what kind of Mutation it is, what the significance of the piece of genetic material is, and whether the cells in question are germ cells.
 Only Mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while Mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 People who are interested in nature,
 Examples of on-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks, and learning about the ecosystem.
 One example of this is the visit,
 Every morning, people leave small provincial towns in their cars to go to work, and they are passed by others whose workplace is the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic Pendulum traffic,
 The science now points to the fact that this massive carbon-based economy has brought the biosphere out of one of its stable states,
 Everyone takes part in the society and uses transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you'll rarely hear about the water quality or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems fail?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between them.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flows is difficult,
 Unfortunately, however,
 To better illustrate the traffic flow,
 These relationships help with the planning,
 Insects were the first animals to conquer the sky.
 Most insects can fold their wings back along their body.
 Through this, they have a wider selection of small hiding places in which they can hide from predators.
 Today, dragonflies and mayflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 For thousands of years,
 Many people thought that he was right,
 It seems reasonable, doesn't it?
 The Amazon is the second longest and the second largest river in the world.
 The Amazon is also the widest River in the world,
 Whole 20 percent of the water that flows into the oceans of the planet comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Although the building of pyramids out of stone was continued until the end of the old empire,
 Egyptians in the ancient new Kingdom admired the monuments of their ancestors, which were then well over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city has about 800 inhabitants.
 The Vatican city uses Italian for its legislation and official communication.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most who work in the state, while Latin is often used at religious ceremonies.
 All the citizens of Vatican city are Roman Catholics.
 Gold, silver, and copper,
 All things are made up of the four elements.
 This matched the four States of aggregation,
 There are two or more Metals.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals.
 There are also alloys,
 The universe consists of matter.
 Atoms are so tiny that billions of them would fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 Therefore, the pencil became a good friend to many people.
 Unfortunately, the pencil has been pushed into the background with the advent of newer writing methods, so that it has been pushed into the background in its status and in its use.
 Nowadays, people write messages on computer screens without ever having to come close to a typewriter.
 One may be anxious to see what will come out of the keyboard.
 The atomic bomb is based on the principle that you need energy to bring together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons.
 So, roughly,
 Some atoms have unstable cores, which means that they will decay at the slightest touch.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rock and dust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and about 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the sea and thicker under the highlands.
 On the Nahside, there could be more Maria, because the crust is thinner.
 Internal theories focus on finding what moves or appeals to people.
 These theories suggest that humans have certain needs and or desires that are internalized over the course of their adulthood.
 These theories are concerned with what makes certain people want to do exactly the things they do, and what influences in their environment cause them to do or not to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's theory of the need hierarchy and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, there are two ways that managers can behave when they start to lead their former colleagues.
 This kind of manager has problems,
 At the other end of the spectrum,
 Ultimately, the team leader is responsible for the team's success and failure.
 This behavior often leads to a breakdown in the relationship between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are run according to the same excellence standards as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members,
 The presence of a real invisible team
 And the invisible team,
 Why would an organization undertake the time-consuming process of introducing a learning organization?
 When all available resources are effectively utilized across all departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can flourish.
 In the end, the joint work of an organization can lead to a new innovative method of meeting customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, the leadership must develop a culture of innovation,
 Angel (2006) explains the continuum concept as a method to help organizations become more efficient.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various kinds of brain damage, such as trauma, injury and tumors,
 Newly emerging Technologies allow us to see and to explore certain brain structures and processes.
 That gives us a lot of information and material to build Simulation models that help us to understand what's going on in our heads.
 KI will be strongly associated with science fiction, but it is an important branch of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research in the field of ai includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are steering, the setting of strategies and timetables, the ability to answer customer questions and queries, as well as handwriting, voice and facial recognition.
 Such things have become to be independent disciplines,
 The KI system is today often used in the areas of business, medicine, engineering and the military, and it has also been incorporated into numerous software applications for home computers and video games.
 Excursions are an important part of every school class. Not seldom a teacher would like to take her or his pupils to places which cannot be reached by bus.
 A virtual excursion is a technical solution. The students can look at museum pieces from the classroom, visit an Aquarium, or admire beautiful works of art.
 A virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year,
 Blogs can also help to improve the writing skills of students.
 So, as a result,
 The Blogging,
 Blogging is a tool that inspires cooperation and encourages students to continue learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of Blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical. By reacting to Internet materials, students can define their own positions in the context of other texts and can articulate their own perspectives on specific topics.
 Ottawa is Canada's beauteous, bilingual capital and is marked by a number of art galleries and museums that present Canada's past and present.
 Further South are the Niagara falls,
 All of these things and more,
 Great areas further North are sparsely populated,
 A population comparison that many are surprised by,
 The East African Islands are in the Indian ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and, as regards the animal world, a continent in itself.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations or belong to France,
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the country, and in the Comoros and Mayotte it was very successful.
 The European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese seafarer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 In the North, it is bordered by the Sahel zone,
 It is recommended that all female travelers claim to be married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 Also, wearing a ring is helpful.
 Women should recognize that cultural differences can lead to what they would consider an assault, and that it's not unusual to be chased, grabbed,
 Stay consistent, when you turn men down, and don't be afraid to defend your position.
 The present Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, before the beginning of the time, and was used by the Phoenicians, the Romans and the Merinides as a strategic port with the name of Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Casa Branca,
 The city was rebuilt by the Moroccan Sultan as Dar el Beida, and it was renamed Casablanca by Spanish traders who established a trading post there.
 Casablanca is one of the most uninteresting places to shop in all of Morocco.
 Around the old Medina,
 Goma is a tourist town in the Democratic Republic of the Congo,
 In the year 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, in particular, the city center.
 While Goma is somewhat safe,
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of the Nyiragongo volcano and for some of the cheapest gorilla tracking tours in Africa.
 You can use Bodabodas,
 This, combined with its relative inaccessibility, has led to Timbuktu becoming a metaphor for exotic, far-off lands.
 Although Timbuktu is known as a tourist attraction,
 In the year 1990, it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 It was one of the most important stations of Louis Gates PBS special,
 The city stands in stark contrast to the rest of the cities in the country, because it has more of an Arabic than an African feel.
 The Kruger National Park lies in northeastern South Africa. It borders Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the North, and the Crocodile River to the South.
 The park has an area of 19,500 square kilometers and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different animal world.
 He is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is regarded as the flagship of South African National Parks.
 Like all South African National Parks,
 It can also be worthwhile to buy a Wild Card, which gives you access to selected parks in South Africa or to all South African National parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the name giver for the territory of Hong Kong and stands in the middle of the tourist center.
 The buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline have been compared to a shimmering bar chart that becomes visible through the presence of Victoria Harbour's waters.
 For the best view of Hongkong,
 The bulk of Hong Kong Island's urbanization is dense and packed along the North Coast.
 This is the place that the British colonists made their own.
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove forest in the world,
 The Sundarbans were declared a UNESCO world heritage site. The part of the forest that lies within the Indian state is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are not only Mangrove swamps,
 The Sundarbans stretch over an area of 3,850 square kilometers,
 The Sundarbans have been a nature reserve since 1966, and estimates suggest that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave all day long from the district-wide bus station,
 So, if you're going to be in the city,
 Most of the districts are served by small Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and stable.
 The two routes,
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a cantilever bridge. It spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 Their two towers are 83 meters high,
 The height of the bridge is 15 meters.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational by September 2017.
 The Guarani were the most important indigenous group that inhabited present-day East Paraguay.
 The Chaco region was also home to other groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called the great province of the West Indies,
 The Spanish began the colonizing period, which lasted three hundred years.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on Las Cañitas Polofields.
 Smaller tournaments and competitions can also be viewed at other times of the year.
 Information about competitions and places to buy Polo tickets can be found at the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Pound, which is pegged to the value of the British pound sterling.
 The only Bank on the Island is in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 Now, the British pound is basically accepted everywhere on the Islands and at Stanley.
 On the remote Islands, credit cards are unlikely to be accepted, although British and U S . currency may be accepted, so inquire in advance with the owners, which method of payment is accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands themselves, so you should exchange the money before you leave the Islands.
 Da Montevideo,
 Montevideo lies in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures of over 30 ° C are usual.
 The winter can be deceptively cold.
 There are no distinct rainy or dry seasons.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people,
 According to the park authority,
 However, peaceful Bison, Wapitis, Elk, bears, and practically all large animals can,
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they don't keep enough distance.
 Be aware that smells can attract bears and other wildlife.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa,
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The harbor was the scene of an ignominious naval battle in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Great Britain refused to leave the harbor.
 All but one British cruiser was sunk.
 During the Mau movement,
 There are two main areas.
 The beaches of North Shore lie on the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Most of them are sandy beaches with safe swimming and most of them offer shade from Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki drive are located at the port of Waitemata, in the upper-class suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 There are family beaches that are sometimes overcrowded, with a nice shopping promenade along the coast. Swimming is safe here.
 The most important local beer is called number one.
 There are many French wines to drink, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better tolerated.
 The local tap water is fine to drink, but if you're worried, you can also find bottled water.
 A small, dark coffee.
 The hot chocolate is Belgian,
 Many trips to the Reef happen all year round, and injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 However, you should follow the advice of authorities,
 Würfelquallen occur in the vicinity of beaches and river mouths from October to April, north of 1770.
 Sharks exist, but they rarely bite humans.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live in the sea,
 A booking in advance gives the traveler the certainty that he will have a place to stay when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with specific hotels, although you may also be able to book other accommodation through a travel agency, such as a tent site.
 Reisebüros usually offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 You can also hold your reservation for you,
 Any changes or requests should be directed to the travel agency and not to the hotel.
 At many festivals, the majority of festival goers decide to camp on site, and most festival goers think this is an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action,
 Think about it,
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the northern East Sea in winter,
 The cruises to St Petersburg also offer time for a stay in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement.
 In the casino,
 You usually have a special offer of food, drinks, and entertainment to keep the guests happy and to make sure they stay.
 Some gambling venues offer free alcoholic beverages.
 Whoever travels in high latitudes or over mountain passes should reckon with snow, ice and temperatures below freezing point.
 On roads that are wet and icy,
 In a snowstorm,
 The visibility can also be impaired by falling or drifting snow, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.
 On the other hand,
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the highlight for many visitors.
 The term Safari,
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes,
 Lions, Leopards, and Leopards are often shy and you can better observe them with a telescope.
 A Footing safari, also called a Bushwalk,
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021. Some events will be held at other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic summer games, after having hosted the first in 1964.
 If you've booked your flights and accommodation for the year 2020 before the postponement was announced, you could find yourself in a difficult situation.
 But most of the cancellation policies,
 It is estimated that the most expensive tickets will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen,
 To ironing clothes.
 If no ironing board is available,
 Be careful that the fabric doesn't get too hot.
 There are several ways to clean water.
 In some areas, it's enough to boil water for one minute,
 The effectiveness of filters varies greatly, and if you have any concerns, then you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may stumble upon animal pests that they are unfamiliar with from their home regions.
 Pests can destroy food, cause irritation, or in the worst case, even cause allergic reactions, poison, or transmit diseases.
 Infections as such or dangerous animals that can hurt or kill humans are usually not classified as pests.
 Duty-Free shopping is the ability to buy goods that are exempt from certain taxes and duties.
 Travellers whose destination has a high tax rate can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on products like alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmount on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway is the greatest driving challenge,
 If you're not used to driving on country roads,
 The indicated speed limits are markedly lower than in the preceding and following sections,
 But, interestingly,
 German Backwaren are quite tasty. In Bavaria they are quite nutritious and varied, just like in the neighboring country of Austria.
 Obstgebäck is widely used, with apples being cooked all year round, and cherries and plums being used in the summer.
 Many German baked goods contain almonds, hazelnuts, or other nuts.
 If you want to make small, but rich, Backwaren, then try what is called Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish that is based on herbs and spices, together with either meat or vegetables.
 A Curry can be either dry or wet, depending on the amount of liquid.
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries,
 With a selection of 17,000 Islands, Indonesian food is an umbrella term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines found all over the country.
 However, if the term is used without further attributes,
 The Javanese cuisine, which is today widespread throughout the island group, offers a variety of simply seasoned dishes. As a taste carrier, the Javanese prefer to use peanuts, chili, sugar and a number of aromatic herbs.
 Side-Reins are aids for the feet of the rider, which hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They give the rider more stability, but there are safety concerns because the rider's feet could get caught in them.
 If a rider falls off his horse,
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, narrow sole.
 Some saddles, especially English saddles,
 The Cochamó Valley,
 The peaks offer a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world discover new routes along the walls, which offer endless possibilities.
 A sport like skiing and snowboarding are popular sports in which one attaches skis or a snowboard to one's feet and slides down a snow-covered slope.
 Skiing is a popular vacation activity with many enthusiasts, sometimes also known as a ski penner, who plan their entire vacation around skiing at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old.
 The origins of skiing as a sport go back at least to the seventeenth century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Skiing with a backpack.
 It resembles alpine touring,
 Consider the skirting route as a comparable hiking route.
 At good conditions, you are able to cover somewhat greater distances than when hiking,
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has numerous independent countries. Normally, one would have to apply for multiple visas and go through several passport controls when traveling through several countries.
 In this respect, however, the Schengen area functions a little bit like a country.
 So long as one remains in this zone,
 You do not have to apply for a visa
 There is no generally valid definition of what constitutes an antique.
 The definition has geographic deviations,
 Handmade products could be called antique, even though they are younger than similar products from mass production.
 The reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around the trade is also important for many who work in other professions.
 Also in the past, not all Sámi have raised reindeer in a large way, but have lived from fishing, hunting and similar things.
 Today, many Sámi work in modern professions.
 Even though the term ""Zigeuner"" is used,
 If a travel warning is issued for the country you are visiting,
 You can also consult the advice of other governments.
 For example,
 Debates are only a short summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are often superficial, general, and in comparison to the more detailed information that can be found elsewhere,
 Weather is the umbrella term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Weather can occur anywhere in the world,
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of a storm, just like thunderstorms, tornadoes, water hoses and whirlwinds.
 Regional and seasonal weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms, and dust storms.
 Travellers are urged to pay attention to any kind of weather that affects their area, as this can have an impact on all travel plans.
 Everyone who plans to travel to a war zone should have professional training.
 And it will probably show you the address of a local company.
 A course covers all the problems discussed here in much more detail,
 A course is usually between two and five days long and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 There are a lot of books and journals on survival in the wilderness,
 Travellers who plan to have a gender-affirming operation abroad must ensure that they have valid travel documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports with an unspecified gender marker,
 The willingness of foreign governments to acknowledge these documents is also very different.
 The searches at security controls have become much more intrusive since the attacks of September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people should not expect their privacy and dignity to be intact when they pass through the scanners.
 Rip currents are the returning tide of waves that break on the shore,
 Because of the underwater topography,
 Most deaths occur when people try to swim against the current.
 When one gets out of the current,
 Try to get somewhere where you won't be caught again.
 The return shock comes earlier than the culture shock,
 Travellers, who find it easy to adapt to a new culture,
 When one comes home after a foreign trip,
 As you first traveled abroad,
 Perhaps, however,
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions for children in the neighborhood.
 You can see the pyramids in the darkness,
 Now, normally,
 The Sphinx is used as a background and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are depicted on the pyramids,
 The Southern Shetland Islands, which were discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most stations. In 2020, sixteen were active.
 The largest is King George Island, with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Further Islands are Livingston Island and Deception, where the flooded Caldera of an still active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworthland is the region south of the Halbinsel, which is bounded by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula here merge into the plateau and then rise again to form the 360-kilometer-long Ellsworth range, which is divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part or the Sentinel Range has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, whose highest peak is Mount Vinson, at 4,892 m.
 In remote areas without Handy coverage,
 A satellite phone is generally no substitute for a mobile phone,
 The service is often used by ships, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that need data and voice connections.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you further information about the service.
 One of the most popular options for people who are planning to take a year off,
 This is especially popular with school leavers,
 In many cases, participation in a foreign gap year program can actually improve your chances of getting into college.
 In general, a tuition fee is charged for the registration to these educational programs.
 Finland is a great destination for boating. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of Islands,
 You don't need a yacht for the archipelago and the lakes.
 Even if the coastal Island groups and the largest lakes are actually large enough for any yacht,
 Boating is the national pastime in Finland,
 This is comparable to Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but otherwise quite unique.
 Most pure Baltic cruises include a longer stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 You can visit the historic town for several whole days,
 If you only go ashore during the cruise,
 Some cruise lines offer Berlin as a destination on their brochures. As you can see on the map, Berlin is far from the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flights can be a daunting experience for people of any age and from any walk of life, especially if they've never flown before or have had a traumatic experience.
 For that, one must not be ashamed.
 To learn more about the functioning of airplanes and the procedures during a flight can help some people to overcome the fear that is associated with the unknown or with the feeling of not having any control.
 For the quick delivery of things,
 On some routes, the larger firms used their own planes,
 When they sent things via air freight,
 The only way to get it through,
 The obvious method, in first or business class,
 As a rough rule of thumb, you can expect to pay
 In general, it is pointless to look for discounts on direct flights from A to B, even for business or first-class seats.
 The airlines know very well that there is a certain core group of people who are willing to pay a lot of money to get to their destination quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic,
 1994 led to the founding of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations,
 The most important religion in Moldova is the Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the second largest port after Istanbul, and a very good transportation hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna is today a modern, progressive, and busy business center, which lies at the mouth of a great Bay and is surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, glazed buildings and modern shopping centres are marked by classic red tile roofs, the market from the eighteenth century, as well as old mosques and churches, although the city emits more of a Mediterranean atmosphere than that of traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers a view of the nearby Island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 On the cemetery there are some interesting marble sculptures of pigeons.
 It is worth while to wander through the fascinating village.
 In the North and in the immediate vicinity lies the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became known to foreigners after Lord Byron had described its splendor in glowing colors.
 The Scotturb-Bus 403 regularly runs over Cabo da Roca to Sintra.
 Also visit in the North the great shrine of Our Lady of the Rosary of Fatima,
 Please bear in mind that you are basically visiting a mass grave as well as a place that has an almost incalculable significance for a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who have survived the time here, and many more with relatives who were murdered there or worked to death, Jews and Non-Jews alike.
 Please treat this place with the dignity, the awe, and the respect that it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish.
 Most of the signs are only in Catalan,
 And yet,
 Normal announcements are made in Catalan, but unforeseen disruptions are reported by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be egotistical, rude, and arrogant.
 So, in Paris,
 The harsh exterior of the Parisian disappears quite quickly,
 The Plitvice National Park is heavily forested,
 He has a remarkable variety of plant communities,
 The area is also home to a huge variety of animal and bird species.
 There are rarely seen European Brown bears, wolves, Eagles, Owls, lynx, Wildcats and Eurasian Eagle Owls as well as many commonly found species.
 When visiting the monasteries, women must wear skirts that reach to the knee, and also cover their shoulders.
 In most monasteries, there are Wrap-Around skirts for women who come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially one in bright colors, the monk or nun at the entrance will give you a smile.
 And so,
 Also these can be borrowed from the collection, but the clothing will not be washed after every user, so you may not feel comfortable in these pants.
 Like the cuisine of the Mediterranean,
 A simple, popular evening meal, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: Bread with olive oil, tomatoes, and any other available ingredients such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 Um all substantives,
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 But it makes it a bit easier to read.
 The Italian pronunciation is relatively easy,
 The most important letters to pay attention to are C and G,
 And so,
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and largely regular grammar.
 So, therefore,
 When one speaks a romance language,
 People who speak some Spanish, however,
 Today, however,
 During the high phase of light pollution,
 Most modern research telescopes are huge,
 The viewing of cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept originated in China, where peach blossoms were the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first Cherry Blossom Festivals were held by the Emperor only for himself and other nobles in the Emperor's court.
 But don't remove it.
 When one visits a formally laid out garden and collects samples,
 Singapore is generally a very safe place,
 So you're in the extreme Tropics,
 There are also a few buses that go North to Hebron,
 Make sure the bus you're taking goes to Hebron, not Kiryat Arba.
 Inner-Harbour waterways can be a good basis for vacation planning.
 For example,
 They also show popular hiking and biking routes.
 In Christianity, Christmas is one of the most important holidays and is considered the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions around the holiday have been adopted by Non-Believers,
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night
 There are of course theological explanations for this tradition, but it could also be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 Traditionally, churches hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night,
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands,
 Because of the great distance from the continent,
 Since the first humans entered the Galapagos Islands,
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in the winter,
 This offers a good opportunity to see the northern lights,
 So,
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners might be used to.
 Suits count as business attire, and colleagues address each other by their last names or job titles.
 The harmony at the workplace is of decisive importance, where the focus is rather on the group performance than on the praise for individual achievements.
 Oftentimes, employees have to get the approval of their supervisors for any decision they make, and it's expected that they will follow their bosses' instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.21778923954731866, 'precisions': [0.6739714320595775, 0.4227065712426806, 0.2921019640618471, 0.20711610486891385], 'brevity_penalty': 0.6010757539131836, 'length_ratio': 0.6626754581125359, 'translation_length': 16382, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 44.70996619607316, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.7280798527769184, 'scores': [0.5626593232154846, 0.34281378984451294, 0.8977136015892029, 0.41963431239128113, 0.42633020877838135, 0.5014536380767822, 0.9207803606987, 0.8395827412605286, 0.8551747798919678, 0.9394522309303284, 0.9059465527534485, 0.4133009910583496, 0.7009713053703308, 0.8856244087219238, 0.8627125024795532, 0.8725140690803528, 0.9089083075523376, 0.41127124428749084, 0.8829483985900879, 0.8526982665061951, 0.9252610802650452, 0.850749135017395, 0.42722660303115845, 0.8699937462806702, 0.37120693922042847, 0.9102770090103149, 0.7640082240104675, 0.6980180144309998, 0.7647736072540283, 0.8684511184692383, 0.6663953065872192, 0.6097247004508972, 0.703623354434967, 0.9091809988021851, 0.535544216632843, 0.7960801720619202, 0.4174898564815521, 0.5204648971557617, 0.4163021743297577, 0.8569164872169495, 0.6895748972892761, 0.9134522080421448, 0.8871148228645325, 0.8843638300895691, 0.5195751190185547, 0.40803059935569763, 0.8690312504768372, 0.8266382813453674, 0.36679232120513916, 0.43988969922065735, 0.9276781678199768, 0.9275125861167908, 0.8895601034164429, 0.9235464930534363, 0.9235377907752991, 0.8915768265724182, 0.45368096232414246, 0.4362940490245819, 0.8844724893569946, 0.951173722743988, 0.5067501664161682, 0.9204261302947998, 0.8799832463264465, 0.8220561146736145, 0.8428357243537903, 0.870964765548706, 0.809421956539154, 0.8432230353355408, 0.7862651348114014, 0.8542121648788452, 0.5820591449737549, 0.802361011505127, 0.6441784501075745, 0.8680858016014099, 0.8728011250495911, 0.468427449464798, 0.6757906675338745, 0.3912472426891327, 0.9534547328948975, 0.33283674716949463, 0.9058951735496521, 0.4458078444004059, 0.8442830443382263, 0.795652449131012, 0.4930651783943176, 0.6742606163024902, 0.3025341033935547, 0.8831228017807007, 0.6405747532844543, 0.8212876915931702, 0.6762199997901917, 0.8657078742980957, 0.8843604922294617, 0.9387992024421692, 0.7384610772132874, 0.5582682490348816, 0.902177095413208, 0.6115624308586121, 0.42327210307121277, 0.6906952857971191, 0.9301887154579163, 0.7017331123352051, 0.8926376700401306, 0.9729158282279968, 0.8734580874443054, 0.7216202020645142, 0.9240172505378723, 0.8755562901496887, 0.6713249683380127, 0.8783118724822998, 0.8917551636695862, 0.9268911480903625, 0.97328120470047, 0.7980473041534424, 0.8385145664215088, 0.8037897348403931, 0.683814287185669, 0.4529778063297272, 0.9657866358757019, 0.8078451752662659, 0.4290858805179596, 0.7113761305809021, 0.7824931740760803, 0.9389781951904297, 0.916677713394165, 0.6636053919792175, 0.90071040391922, 0.876369833946228, 0.3329414427280426, 0.6349016427993774, 0.8751142621040344, 0.8872460722923279, 0.9058005213737488, 0.9016943573951721, 0.43499234318733215, 0.636738121509552, 0.8611575365066528, 0.8820222020149231, 0.9533644914627075, 0.68949955701828, 0.8866970539093018, 0.8516377806663513, 0.620895504951477, 0.7404054403305054, 0.5824691653251648, 0.9002851843833923, 0.5943717956542969, 0.9175597429275513, 0.9049379229545593, 0.9070946574211121, 0.6244404315948486, 0.40430256724357605, 0.8882846236228943, 0.5359676480293274, 0.6050472855567932, 0.8801261782646179, 0.8588322997093201, 0.4415622055530548, 0.8404475450515747, 0.9158070683479309, 0.7832323908805847, 0.32457008957862854, 0.6253347992897034, 0.631770670413971, 0.8815800547599792, 0.8726516366004944, 0.7153248190879822, 0.760638415813446, 0.8738560080528259, 0.6354395747184753, 0.8034862875938416, 0.8630492687225342, 0.7749029994010925, 0.45951321721076965, 0.31136876344680786, 0.9346179366111755, 0.8593264818191528, 0.8876842260360718, 0.8648884892463684, 0.6791381239891052, 0.8815478682518005, 0.9215819239616394, 0.9011008143424988, 0.8888989686965942, 0.8992041945457458, 0.7207967042922974, 0.9751046299934387, 0.4986235201358795, 0.7563743591308594, 0.5657041668891907, 0.8879901766777039, 0.48700985312461853, 0.46315431594848633, 0.2968808710575104, 0.6399645209312439, 0.9376240372657776, 0.4792690873146057, 0.5703708529472351, 0.43301382660865784, 0.398932546377182, 0.8340319395065308, 0.7427799105644226, 0.6417978405952454, 0.7498835921287537, 0.903723418712616, 0.8904237151145935, 0.5299890637397766, 0.8819182515144348, 0.7145865559577942, 0.83416748046875, 0.536480724811554, 0.9095191359519958, 0.6098976731300354, 0.7189949154853821, 0.7056811451911926, 0.5854166746139526, 0.8737750053405762, 0.9015660285949707, 0.8545398712158203, 0.8888022303581238, 0.9101599454879761, 0.7463337182998657, 0.7518538236618042, 0.4072871506214142, 0.9335041642189026, 0.8936129212379456, 0.8603934049606323, 0.8597657084465027, 0.9135406613349915, 0.4430619478225708, 0.8753477334976196, 0.4393565356731415, 0.8244588375091553, 0.8755449652671814, 0.3498808443546295, 0.8142558932304382, 0.8956560492515564, 0.48001280426979065, 0.9401164650917053, 0.8888658285140991, 0.80682772397995, 0.7985787987709045, 0.391828328371048, 0.559124767780304, 0.46339499950408936, 0.40014705061912537, 0.43826261162757874, 0.557649552822113, 0.3359888792037964, 0.9426038265228271, 0.9048678874969482, 0.9191102981567383, 0.8083662390708923, 0.9244163632392883, 0.8630911111831665, 0.5549816489219666, 0.9137247204780579, 0.7072908878326416, 0.8894304633140564, 0.8765953183174133, 0.9152811169624329, 0.8442673087120056, 0.5182920694351196, 0.571483314037323, 0.9299737215042114, 0.4666012227535248, 0.48275211453437805, 0.840340256690979, 0.9393212795257568, 0.8276531100273132, 0.7498853206634521, 0.7016627192497253, 0.6853684186935425, 0.36152806878089905, 0.562035083770752, 0.6503967642784119, 0.588469922542572, 0.9026300311088562, 0.531066358089447, 0.9412518739700317, 0.5769030451774597, 0.7481921911239624, 0.9003365635871887, 0.8908359408378601, 0.9066134095191956, 0.920676052570343, 0.804998517036438, 0.6370763182640076, 0.5789162516593933, 0.5303118824958801, 0.8739728331565857, 0.8046914339065552, 0.8984158635139465, 0.8686828017234802, 0.44001534581184387, 0.6864469051361084, 0.43401816487312317, 0.8791206479072571, 0.9198170304298401, 0.861939549446106, 0.9379259943962097, 0.8766534924507141, 0.6119256615638733, 0.5396432280540466, 0.7950028777122498, 0.7962701916694641, 0.8518327474594116, 0.6526739597320557, 0.9163150191307068, 0.7606294751167297, 0.7246370911598206, 0.8991544842720032, 0.8761951327323914, 0.5629034042358398, 0.9321977496147156, 0.8995596766471863, 0.544141948223114, 0.812903881072998, 0.5424796342849731, 0.5569184422492981, 0.3638317883014679, 0.7832992672920227, 0.7906131744384766, 0.4703981578350067, 0.6527102589607239, 0.7093186974525452, 0.8042945265769958, 0.8687652945518494, 0.913990318775177, 0.8076966404914856, 0.916693389415741, 0.31910252571105957, 0.5230580568313599, 0.8061250448226929, 0.9206551313400269, 0.893743634223938, 0.8863967657089233, 0.8065692186355591, 0.5402819514274597, 0.9114989638328552, 0.8676949143409729, 0.7612852454185486, 0.7868125438690186, 0.6791155934333801, 0.7974164485931396, 0.8251234889030457, 0.8961902260780334, 0.737179160118103, 0.675968587398529, 0.7907304167747498, 0.3376527726650238, 0.9129587411880493, 0.463325172662735, 0.7764886021614075, 0.9171451926231384, 0.5920160412788391, 0.6097388863563538, 0.640038251876831, 0.9102505445480347, 0.5543705821037292, 0.5148524641990662, 0.8976891040802002, 0.7804154753684998, 0.7371850609779358, 0.8690997362136841, 0.4935387372970581, 0.5948044657707214, 0.7605517506599426, 0.7266092896461487, 0.7714672088623047, 0.2618737816810608, 0.43537378311157227, 0.40438300371170044, 0.9096745848655701, 0.8066858649253845, 0.7992511987686157, 0.9118483662605286, 0.5762826800346375, 0.874357283115387, 0.7994753122329712, 0.7782329320907593, 0.7612349390983582, 0.7997856140136719, 0.55613774061203, 0.5522608757019043, 0.4298807382583618, 0.6278584003448486, 0.8516709208488464, 0.6555083394050598, 0.859580934047699, 0.78500896692276, 0.618375301361084, 0.6322156190872192, 0.9290506839752197, 0.5323420166969299, 0.8259109854698181, 0.6133562922477722, 0.9374595880508423, 0.8434032797813416, 0.529404878616333, 0.9227102994918823, 0.4825235605239868, 0.5475975871086121, 0.5784716010093689, 0.35855647921562195, 0.8535658717155457, 0.9079997539520264, 0.5016535520553589, 0.8404805660247803, 0.8677601218223572, 0.5295931696891785, 0.8648390173912048, 0.8132962584495544, 0.8500692248344421, 0.4270397126674652, 0.3438630700111389, 0.8012328743934631, 0.6671172380447388, 0.870370090007782, 0.8693239688873291, 0.6850036978721619, 0.7004356980323792, 0.7304079532623291, 0.858289897441864, 0.8299277424812317, 0.4987351596355438, 0.5000200867652893, 0.8986424207687378, 0.933861494064331, 0.9551858305931091, 0.8981809020042419, 0.5623518824577332, 0.3039661943912506, 0.5636547803878784, 0.6570242643356323, 0.8255555033683777, 0.8416927456855774, 0.5648221373558044, 0.46406176686286926, 0.7977301478385925, 0.847490131855011, 0.39193516969680786, 0.6075796484947205, 0.44903364777565, 0.2989813983440399, 0.5961335897445679, 0.9299393892288208, 0.7149813175201416, 0.29818645119667053, 0.7835896611213684, 0.5889742970466614, 0.40341001749038696, 0.8106220960617065, 0.7723848819732666, 0.5252392292022705, 0.8630457520484924, 0.5616899132728577, 0.8972155451774597, 0.826230525970459, 0.865437388420105, 0.7946452498435974, 0.5408777594566345, 0.5533812642097473, 0.888753354549408, 0.35721415281295776, 0.5077587962150574, 0.5470883250236511, 0.6425085067749023, 0.4149613678455353, 0.6050927639007568, 0.5335094332695007, 0.3942941725254059, 0.7346646189689636, 0.6915318965911865, 0.349696546792984, 0.8248189091682434, 0.6170130372047424, 0.4674537777900696, 0.6575040221214294, 0.8942016959190369, 0.8608326315879822, 0.899681806564331, 0.8647289276123047, 0.858323335647583, 0.8149261474609375, 0.8956928849220276, 0.8829122185707092, 0.8417165875434875, 0.6161927580833435, 0.9101014733314514, 0.8622835278511047, 0.818047821521759, 0.9295644760131836, 0.9144490957260132, 0.4012536406517029, 0.4739648997783661, 0.5327882766723633, 0.8872118592262268, 0.7572900652885437, 0.9401180744171143, 0.8683639168739319, 0.9276297688484192, 0.8929941654205322, 0.8926201462745667, 0.41274353861808777, 0.7553134560585022, 0.5861831307411194, 0.3860415518283844, 0.8087287545204163, 0.8861048817634583, 0.42405518889427185, 0.7992863655090332, 0.8720007538795471, 0.8809710144996643, 0.817959725856781, 0.9353610873222351, 0.837544858455658, 0.8445500731468201, 0.8595331311225891, 0.8689449429512024, 0.6921852231025696, 0.7366902232170105, 0.8517093658447266, 0.6095514297485352, 0.6478083729743958, 0.7507642507553101, 0.716144323348999, 0.6503995060920715, 0.8311834931373596, 0.5612900853157043, 0.6970852613449097, 0.5786941051483154, 0.8647862076759338, 0.7353612780570984, 0.6896225810050964, 0.4018409550189972, 0.689565896987915, 0.5099980235099792, 0.754436194896698, 0.9319900274276733, 0.7227582931518555, 0.7899767160415649, 0.8522248864173889, 0.5674837827682495, 0.8766948580741882, 0.9322350025177002, 0.4375576972961426, 0.8638659119606018, 0.3863486647605896, 0.91268390417099, 0.8512044548988342, 0.8488184213638306, 0.895340621471405, 0.5655409693717957, 0.8994914889335632, 0.4746232032775879, 0.5799911618232727, 0.297030508518219, 0.5418323278427124, 0.5188413262367249, 0.8953028321266174, 0.7839944362640381, 0.598232090473175, 0.5794670581817627, 0.8787451386451721, 0.6000708937644958, 0.42075663805007935, 0.8802372217178345, 0.39630386233329773, 0.6895635724067688, 0.9367141127586365, 0.721915066242218, 0.7332754731178284, 0.8135274648666382, 0.6885796189308167, 0.8230043649673462, 0.5497416257858276, 0.4640730321407318, 0.8248351216316223, 0.9002495408058167, 0.8595513105392456, 0.9397266507148743, 0.874323844909668, 0.8034916520118713, 0.4274585545063019, 0.884318470954895, 0.9313802123069763, 0.923482358455658, 0.9086737036705017, 0.8926413059234619, 0.4632668197154999, 0.8894039988517761, 0.4938696026802063, 0.30732253193855286, 0.9167993068695068, 0.5246438980102539, 0.9234734177589417, 0.3674063980579376, 0.8223252296447754, 0.9094212651252747, 0.5300855040550232, 0.45882660150527954, 0.8548395037651062, 0.9034847021102905, 0.5382521748542786, 0.9452663064002991, 0.5296531915664673, 0.8772598505020142, 0.441709965467453, 0.8265699148178101, 0.8177812695503235, 0.8511082530021667, 0.6848394870758057, 0.9001026749610901, 0.6235143542289734, 0.33241021633148193, 0.6265713572502136, 0.6511375308036804, 0.6440280675888062, 0.8584729433059692, 0.8714953064918518, 0.8904735445976257, 0.39757660031318665, 0.5245389342308044, 0.6086578965187073, 0.7985265851020813, 0.7946648001670837, 0.9245961308479309, 0.7589794993400574, 0.7357563376426697, 0.8787067532539368, 0.5787059664726257, 0.9421008825302124, 0.9459043145179749, 0.9661290049552917, 0.4011966586112976, 0.6190435290336609, 0.401276558637619, 0.5745280385017395, 0.9067540764808655, 0.5723782181739807, 0.7052896022796631, 0.8555031418800354, 0.8550761342048645, 0.763825535774231, 0.86775141954422, 0.7009186148643494, 0.8867212533950806, 0.3584691882133484, 0.8197040557861328, 0.8589053750038147, 0.9353556632995605, 0.8933730125427246, 0.4922317862510681, 0.8347448110580444, 0.9250115752220154, 0.895830512046814, 0.8897646069526672, 0.6983552575111389, 0.466580867767334, 0.44905850291252136, 0.9048035740852356, 0.9031677842140198, 0.913817822933197, 0.9618831276893616, 0.6867064237594604, 0.6317402124404907, 0.5000172257423401, 0.8234566450119019, 0.9307441711425781, 0.8638623356819153, 0.8395791053771973, 0.8887730240821838, 0.812896192073822, 0.9434510469436646, 0.737316370010376, 0.8472306132316589, 0.8965645432472229, 0.90436851978302, 0.9069620370864868, 0.8488189578056335, 0.7643826007843018, 0.8975039124488831, 0.8487326502799988, 0.8406388163566589, 0.9222498536109924, 0.38027423620224, 0.7227226495742798, 0.3603421151638031, 0.38168683648109436, 0.938956618309021, 0.8576497435569763, 0.9095489382743835, 0.707711398601532, 0.49496856331825256, 0.7671533823013306, 0.5696389675140381, 0.9276710748672485, 0.8503779768943787, 0.7521451115608215, 0.8758946061134338, 0.920380175113678, 0.7297032475471497, 0.8783565759658813, 0.6840120553970337, 0.8573582768440247, 0.7362571358680725, 0.8593714833259583, 0.8533653616905212, 0.9077380299568176, 0.9359117150306702, 0.4017626941204071, 0.8643010854721069, 0.8907518982887268, 0.622646152973175, 0.88803631067276, 0.36509570479393005, 0.8900870084762573, 0.6693536043167114, 0.8112010359764099, 0.6131483912467957, 0.900262176990509, 0.8624690175056458, 0.8959102630615234, 0.8446127772331238, 0.5922933220863342, 0.890762984752655, 0.7499790787696838, 0.8273302912712097, 0.5900433659553528, 0.7882125973701477, 0.68895024061203, 0.5789347887039185, 0.9042866230010986, 0.5929889678955078, 0.7105168700218201, 0.8636638522148132, 0.5664958953857422, 0.38304170966148376, 0.9206699728965759, 0.44240620732307434, 0.8562982678413391, 0.6846144199371338, 0.6068213582038879, 0.8234376311302185, 0.7692711353302002, 0.9286525249481201, 0.504366397857666, 0.9176183938980103, 0.9367641806602478, 0.9348583817481995, 0.8792341351509094, 0.8912619948387146, 0.888942539691925, 0.7933018803596497, 0.7984771132469177, 0.7453836798667908, 0.8774245381355286, 0.8738035559654236, 0.24236218631267548, 0.9395597577095032, 0.6563004851341248, 0.8271651864051819, 0.7276357412338257, 0.4019334018230438, 0.5489351153373718, 0.7674384117126465, 0.7205806374549866, 0.6981051564216614, 0.9683462381362915, 0.9058319926261902, 0.7611910700798035, 0.42759981751441956, 0.48911139369010925, 0.9102087616920471, 0.888910710811615, 0.8376023173332214, 0.8884796500205994, 0.6208954453468323, 0.8488864302635193, 0.8760619163513184, 0.4005625545978546, 0.6408048272132874, 0.889115035533905, 0.6639650464057922, 0.5590386986732483, 0.804036557674408, 0.6278210282325745, 0.886248767375946, 0.8802263140678406, 0.8846345543861389, 0.474905401468277, 0.8821924924850464, 0.8910052180290222, 0.7127225995063782, 0.3250502943992615, 0.9687204360961914, 0.5192174315452576, 0.8903196454048157, 0.38707229495048523, 0.8724247217178345, 0.6686330437660217, 0.8691133260726929, 0.5777769684791565, 0.4678764045238495, 0.9083805680274963, 0.39275917410850525, 0.9528184533119202, 0.4792843461036682, 0.5323198437690735, 0.7417475581169128, 0.6410521864891052, 0.9337966442108154, 0.9372538924217224, 0.9041313529014587, 0.4789253771305084, 0.8178095817565918, 0.4305649697780609, 0.5364086627960205, 0.7201692461967468, 0.7098143100738525, 0.745934784412384, 0.9187771677970886, 0.9050485491752625, 0.924904465675354, 0.8604676127433777, 0.8965871334075928, 0.9028595089912415, 0.7857714891433716, 0.6407270431518555, 0.6936743259429932, 0.46852728724479675, 0.7736276388168335, 0.7392883896827698, 0.8001620173454285, 0.8069387674331665, 0.9464151263237, 0.8494623303413391, 0.7415544986724854, 0.8991891145706177, 0.5605655908584595, 0.81682288646698, 0.8548527359962463, 0.8945215344429016, 0.49572399258613586, 0.9134359955787659, 0.37755778431892395, 0.3805251121520996, 0.847122311592102, 0.8274319767951965, 0.8461090326309204, 0.656500518321991, 0.9141045808792114, 0.5122241377830505, 0.4708835184574127, 0.6823486685752869, 0.6194412708282471, 0.8902532458305359, 0.8164324760437012, 0.4817142188549042, 0.5638074278831482, 0.7168385982513428, 0.5385830998420715, 0.9014204740524292, 0.890303909778595, 0.8108343482017517, 0.7234508991241455, 0.40521523356437683, 0.7049030661582947, 0.7431703209877014, 0.3899310827255249, 0.8205805420875549, 0.8526282906532288, 0.8757546544075012, 0.6086704134941101, 0.8398529887199402, 0.9321398138999939, 0.8519211411476135, 0.9004853367805481, 0.6696829199790955, 0.7955853343009949, 0.9150822758674622, 0.756260871887207, 0.8560190200805664, 0.7230649590492249, 0.86201012134552, 0.8705318570137024, 0.9069977402687073, 0.7068930268287659, 0.5435898900032043, 0.8178720474243164, 0.5878934264183044, 0.7036325335502625, 0.599159300327301, 0.6542484760284424, 0.5311949253082275, 0.5070430040359497, 0.33954259753227234, 0.9239363670349121, 0.7744632363319397, 0.3613009452819824, 0.899560272693634, 0.7456834316253662, 0.8599310517311096, 0.7799026966094971, 0.8540977239608765, 0.8878840208053589, 0.8504926562309265, 0.901738703250885, 0.6767076253890991, 0.7340357303619385, 0.8918190598487854, 0.9152668118476868, 0.7133933901786804, 0.5837709903717041, 0.8693206906318665, 0.9029330015182495, 0.8047354221343994, 0.8267982006072998, 0.6875321269035339, 0.729089081287384, 0.7952515482902527, 0.8276062607765198, 0.6380788683891296, 0.6835125088691711, 0.8872745633125305, 0.9072040319442749, 0.48400235176086426, 0.8597273230552673, 0.5171809196472168, 0.791801393032074, 0.5897698998451233, 0.4057357907295227, 0.49779561161994934, 0.5789204239845276, 0.8999122381210327, 0.8918595910072327, 0.7156046032905579, 0.6906952261924744, 0.8964806199073792, 0.6244644522666931, 0.9505607485771179, 0.9333612322807312, 0.8937672972679138, 0.8602109551429749, 0.9109063744544983, 0.80197674036026, 0.8442883491516113, 0.8585624694824219, 0.8656421303749084, 0.7840650677680969, 0.9072226881980896, 0.881671130657196, 0.7552981972694397, 0.8130368590354919, 0.7433966994285583, 0.7010137438774109, 0.4042656719684601, 0.87754225730896, 0.9281623959541321, 0.2544723451137543, 0.6260561347007751, 0.6352822780609131, 0.5172393918037415, 0.9594394564628601, 0.6656021475791931, 0.8936484456062317, 0.8356658220291138, 0.2929246425628662, 0.7364117503166199, 0.46639564633369446, 0.906359076499939, 0.35797935724258423, 0.970180094242096, 0.4470355212688446, 0.6484465599060059, 0.6631444692611694, 0.328926682472229, 0.9407150149345398, 0.2901988923549652, 0.45270293951034546, 0.46435460448265076, 0.35098734498023987, 0.5004364848136902, 0.7593388557434082, 0.9151543974876404, 0.919096052646637, 0.8301214575767517, 0.3856687545776367, 0.6217971444129944, 0.6715805530548096, 0.49152061343193054, 0.48276156187057495, 0.7850929498672485, 0.8181723952293396, 0.29525062441825867, 0.8944784998893738, 0.93215012550354, 0.7909568548202515, 0.5311083793640137, 0.9152585864067078, 0.632932722568512, 0.5920404195785522, 0.45993730425834656, 0.4983275234699249, 0.6173706650733948, 0.6122184991836548, 0.3259475529193878, 0.9533172249794006, 0.8924843668937683, 0.8469125628471375, 0.8858329057693481]} And we've now got mice that are four months old,
 Dr . Ehud Ur,
 Like some other experts, he was skeptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, and pointed out that the findings were of no significance for people who were already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy,
 Danius said,
 The company was founded by Jamie Siminoff,
 He said he had built a WLAN doorbell.
 Siminoff said that sales had increased after his appearance on the show in 2013, although the show's panel had rejected the financing of his start-up.
 At the end of 2017, Siminoff appeared on the Teleshopping channel, QVC.
 Ring has also settled a lawsuit with the competing security firm ADT Corporation.
 While an experimental vaccine seems to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, there are no drugs that have been proven to be clearly suitable for the treatment of existing infections.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp,
 In the PALM study, ZMapp was used as a control,
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts it as an absolute necessity for the Olympic family to stand up for a safe and healthy environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that it is in the best interest of our athletes, our clubs and our sport to make meaningful changes within our organization rather than to decertify.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could bring to light how abuse of the magnitude that has been so bravely described by the survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone unchecked for so long, and welcomes any and all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal of making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for our athletes so they can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowered environment.
 During the 1960s,
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy and then served from 1977 to 1981 as national security advisor,
 As a national security advisor, he supported Carter in the diplomatic handling of world affairs such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the Iran hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The movie with Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone has received nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and stone were nominated as best actor and best actress.
 There are also nominations for best film,
 Two songs from the movie, Audition and City of stars, got nominations for the best original song. Lionsgate studio got twenty six nominations, more than any other film studio.
 On the late Sunday,
 The announcement came after a phone call from Trump to Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would carry out the surveillance of the more hardened ISIS fighters, whose return to European countries had been refused.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers,
 Scientists say that the feathers on the top of this bird were chestnut-brown,
 The Fund also gives insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Weil the dinosaur feathers have no well-developed shaft, which is called the rachis, but have other features of feathers,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight,
 The researchers claimed, although this is the tail of a young dinosaur,
 A car bomb detonated this morning at the Turkish police headquarters in Gaziantep, killing two police officers and wounding over twenty other people.
 According to the governor's office,
 The police said they suspected a militant supporter of Daesh.
 You have found out that the sun,
 To determine the Rossby number of a Star,
 The smaller the Rossby number,
 During the voyage, Iwasaki encountered many difficulties.
 He was robbed by Pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet,
 The 802.11n standard runs on the frequencies 2.4 GHz and 5 GHz.
 Through this, it can be downward compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual-radio.
 The speed of 802.11 n is significantly faster than that of the predecessors, which had a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, married and with two grown children,
 And Miller said,
 We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 to a level significantly lower than that of 2005.
 He did not give a number, but said it would be based on the performance of the Chinese economy.
 Hu ermutigte Entwicklungsländer,
 However, he added,
 The study group on Iraq presented its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 No one can guarantee that any course of action in Iraq at this point will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or a slide into chaos.
 The report starts with a call for an open discussion and consensus building in the USA on a strategy for the Middle East.
 The report is extremely critical of almost every aspect of the current executive policy on Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to reestablish diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Senator and Argentine First Lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for President last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 As a member of the Argentinean Parliament,
 And the controversy was,
 The criticism of the liberals on the reconstruction process has focused on the fact that contracts for the reconstruction were given to alleged insiders in Washington.
 More than four million people came to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of participants was so great,
 Several large television screens were set up at various locations in Rome, so that people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar facilities were installed, which were seen by many people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's earlier policy of concentrating its resources on what they considered to be easy cases,
 The Congress began in August 2005 with the financing of the anti-Obscenity initiative and established that the FBI must deploy 10 agents for the adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa reached the highest point of the innings, 70 points, with only 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The leaders of the middle row, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, showed good performance and achieved a partnership with 100 runs.
 But after the loss of the captain's wicket, India scored only 36 runs and lost 7 wickets,
 The U S . President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November sixteen,
 He was greeted by Wong Kan Seng, the deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and spoke with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore, about trade and terrorism.
 After a week of losses in the midterm elections,
 Premier Stephen Harper has agreed to send the clean air act to a committee of all parties for review before the second reading.
 Layton had during the meeting with the Prime Minister demanded changes to the Conservative's environmental law, and had called for a, quote,
 After the Federal Government had taken over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some members of the state parliament criticised the move as a PR stunt in the lead-up to the Federal election in November.
 Premier John Howard said, however, the measure, providing 45 million Australian dollars, was only to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading the hospitals.
 According to the current bulletin,
 There were no significant damage or injuries reported from Tonga.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii,
 President George W . Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe,
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, which was given the name Subtropical Storm Jerry, has formed today in the Atlantic ocean.
 At this point,
 The American engineer Corps estimated that 6 inches of rain could cause the already damaged dams to break.
 The Ninth Ward, which was flooded up to twenty feet during Hurricane Katrina, is currently experiencing a twenty-foot flood.
 On a 100 foot long section,
 The Commons-Administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disappointment with the distances,
 Um so to speak,
 The Irritations in the community led to the current efforts to draft a policy regarding sexual content for the Website, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work was largely theoretical,
 The effect, after the team sought, would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 Exactly as the moon draws the earth and causes the tides,
 The scientists came to the conclusion that dark matter acts on other dark matter in the same way that normal matter acts on normal matter.
 This theory says that the largest part of the dark matter is in a kind of halo around a Galaxy, and it's made up of many small particles.
 Television reports show that white smoke is coming out of the plant.
 The local authorities are urging residents near the plant to stay indoors,
 According to the nuclear authority of Japan,
 The authorities speculate that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel at the site could have been torn open and are possibly leaking.
 The extremely drug-resistant TB,
 And he said,
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital,
 Within a year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Despite this, the proportion of XDR-TB amongst all the people with TB is still low,
 The two satellites, which weighed more than 1,000 pounds, collided 491 miles above the earth at an approximate speed of 17,500 miles per hour.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 You're still trying to figure out how extensive the collision was and how the earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the United States Department of defense finds the wreckage.
 The outcome of the plotting analysis will be published on a public Website.
 A nurse who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is being charged with the murder of her mother, who was found dead in the trunk of her car in Ohio.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground beside the road in T-shirt and underwear,
 She led the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blood-soaked sheets.
 The police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported in late July.
 The disease is transferred from the pigs to the mosquitoes,
 The outbreak of the disease led the Indian government to hire swine catchers, to distribute thousands of mosquito nets, and to spray plant protection materials.
 The government has also promised several million vials of vaccine against brain inflammation, which will help the health authorities to be wary for the next year.
 Plans for vaccines, which should have been delivered this year to the historically hardest hit areas,
 In the year 1956,
 He made over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 The quality and precision of his work are so highly regarded that his name is one of the very few generally known names in the field of philately.
 His one thousandth stamp, from the year 2000,
 He was also involved in the design of the Canadian five and one hundred dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to a nearby hospital,
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 A person who worked in a workshop near the scene of the accident said,
 They all ran back to the scene of the accident.
 More items on the agenda in Bali are the rescue of the world's remaining forests and the joint use of technologies that are supposed to help developing countries grow in a less environmentally damaging way.
 The United Nations,
 The means could be used for flood-proof houses,
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some women who wanted to speak out about women's health were being drowned out.
 To this conclusion she came as a result of the numerous positive comments and the encouragement she received from both men and women who urged that contraceptives should be regarded as a medical necessity.
 As the fighting stopped after the transport of the wounded to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed on the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 The negotiators tried to defuse the situation, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 11:00 PM MDT,
 The police then entered the building.
 The firefighters were able to put out the fire at 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the annual floods, which distribute sediments in the river, came to a halt.
 This sediment was necessary to form sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 Two fish species have become extinct,
 The authorities hope that the rise in water level after the flood will be enough to restore eroded sandbanks downstream, although it is only a few feet.
 No Tsunami warning was issued, and according to the Geophysics Department of Jakarta, there will be no Tsunami warning, as the earthquake did not reach the necessary magnitude of 6.5.
 Although there was no tsunami danger,
 Although Winfrey shed tears at her farewell,
 This will not be a farewell.
 The results of the Presidential and Parliamentary elections in Namibia have indicated that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was re-elected by a wide margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation,
 Troops of the coalition and Afghan troops rushed into the area to secure the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to support.
 The crash occurred high up in mountainous terrain, and it is suspected that it was the result of enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 This is the worst outbreak that's been recorded in the country.
 And he said,
 The games started at 10:00 am in great weather and apart from some drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared, it was an ideal day for 7s Rugby.
 South Africa, the top-ranked team,
 Although the team definitely rusted against their Southern sisters,
 Your disciplined defense, ball control and excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team that had to be defeated.
 Officials of the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum say that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a danger to public health,
 He would have been dismissed on Tuesday,
 All of the caves, also called the seven sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show temperature differences between night and day, which indicate that these are probably caves.
 And they're colder than the surrounding surface.
 So it's not just a matter of,
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech affair.
 After the officials have verified the identity of the voter,
 The French election law lays out the process quite strictly.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no ballot envelopes are present at the beginning of the election and that no ballot envelopes are added except those of the properly counted and authorized voters.
 The candidates can send representatives who can witness every part of the process.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously brought to the market based on Spar- and Functionality-Factors, became the hot topic at the Taipei IT Month.
 But the consumer market for laptop computers will be radically changed after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by manager Yuan from the Republic of China.
 The Website of the broadcaster describes the show as,
 In their early days, the show was only broadcast on the old-school Internet radio station TogiNet radio,
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet founded the AstroNet Radio branch.
 The show originally featured local amateur synchronized swimmers from East Texas.
 According to reports,
 And more and more,
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the demonstrators from the South for the lawlessness.
 South Africa has defeated the All Blacks in a Rugby Union match in the three nation tournament at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a win with a one point lead of 21 to 20, which ended the All Blacks' winning streak of 15 games.
 For the Springboks ended a five-game losing streak.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks,
 The final of the tournament will be played next week in the Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will play against Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana on Monday at 22:08.
 No immediate reports of damage were received by the United States Geological Survey and the National earthquake information center.
 The center of the earthquake was about 20 kilometers north-northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the bird flu H5N1, which is deadly to humans, has infected a wild duck that was found dead on Monday in a marshy area near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country of the European Union to be hit by the virus.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for the death,
 Chambers, an Agnostic, argues that his suit was frivolous,
 The story, which is presented in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saens,
 Therefore, the actors on the stage smoke cannabis joints, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 The former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich,
 After the results, Gingrich praised Santorum,
 He said, quote,
 Bachmann, who won the Ames-Stampede poll in August,
 The photographer was brought to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he subsequently died.
 In a statement, Bieber said,
 The photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard,
 The driver of the vehicle,
 So it's not just a question of,
 To that list belong the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen placed ninth yesterday in the super-G, and Finland with Katja Saarinen, who placed tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was eleventh in the standing Super-G.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez came in as the fifteenth in the super G.
 The visually impaired Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in the Super-G in the thirteenth place.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake of 2010, are being blamed for the spread of the disease, which broke out near the troops' camp.
 The complaint alleges that the waste from the UN camp was not properly cleaned, which led to bacteria entering the Artibonit River, one of the largest rivers in Haiti.
 Before the arrival of the troops,
 The Haitian Institute for justice and democracy has pointed to independent studies that suggest the Nepalese UN peacekeeping force may have brought the disease unwittingly to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease,
 Hamilton bestätigte, that the Howard University hospital had taken in the patient in a stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria,
 The hospital followed protocols for infection control, including the separation of the patient from others to prevent infection of third parties.
 Before the Simpsons,
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like taxi,
 1989, half er Brooks and Groening created the Simpsons and were responsible for the hiring of the first author team of the show.
 Although he left the show in 1993,
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua reported the planned hijacking of an airplane.
 Later reports then said the plane had received a bomb threat and had been diverted to Kandahar, where it landed.
 First reports say the plane was diverted to Urumqi after it was refused permission to land.
 Accidents are frequent in Iran, which has an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military use.
 International sanctions have made it impossible to buy new planes.
 At the beginning of the week, three people were killed and three others were injured.
 Last month, Iran suffered its worst airplane disaster in years,
 In the same month, a further passenger plane,
 Aerosmith have canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was supposed to tour through the United States and Canada.
 After the front singer Steven Tyler injured himself during a fall from the stage on August 5, they have canceled the tour.
 Murray lost the first set in the tiebreak after both men had held every single service game.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but a tie break was required after the score reached 6:6.
 Potros Schulter was in the meantime treated,
 The program began at 20:30 local time.
 Famous singers from all over the land,
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakkha Singh took over the leadership of the Bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 Teller Chhappan Bhog.
 Lakkha Singh presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan.
 At the Tokyo Game Show keynote presentation on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the Controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution Console.
 Like a TV remote control,
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in Video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and had to retire shortly after the start.
 His teammate led the most of the race, but ended it shortly after his pit stop, probably because of a badly jammed right front tire.
 Shortly after Alonso, Michael also ended his race due to damage to the wheel suspension from the numerous fights during the race.
 And he said,
 I was very much moved.
 About 3 minutes after takeoff,
 But people don't assume that.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr.,
 After five minutes, the wind came up, about a minute later, the wind reached 70 km/h.
 And I'm like,
 The NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported that the earthquake had no effect, and that reactors number one and two of the Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 It is reported that about 9,400 houses in the region have no water and about 100 have no electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and the railway service in the affected areas was disrupted.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office.
 Three more bombs detonated within two hours of government buildings.
 According to some reports,
 Both Cyanuric acid and Melamine were found in urine samples from pets that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The two connections react with each other and form crystals, which can, according to the researchers of the University,
 The researchers discovered crystals in the cat's urine that had formed through the addition of Melamine and Cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to the composition found in the urine of affected animals when they are compared by means of infrared spectroscopy.
 I don't know if you knew, but most goods from Central America came in to our country duty-free.
 Eighty percent of our goods were taxed in Central American countries.
 That seemed not to be the case.
 I only say to the people,
 The California governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill into law that bans the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The proposed law would require that in the state of California,
 The director of the CPS, Kier Starmer,
 Huhne is stepping down and will be replaced in the cabinet by the MP Ed Davey. It is expected that the MP Norman Lamb will take over the role of the business Secretary, which Davey is just vacating.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear in Westminster Magistrates Court on the 16th of February.
 The two dead were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21.
 Edgar Veguilla erlitt Wunden am Arm and the jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery for his face.
 The weapon of Uka had a safety, as he aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has been in chronic pain ever since, and is now blind in one eye, and has lost part of his skull.
 Schneider said of a Video call from a base of the us Air Force in his home country.
 Over the course of the week,
 In her first run, she received a DNF.
 Ihr anderes Rennen, den Riesenslalom, beendete sie with the 10th place in the women's group with a combined running time of 4:41,30. Damit was she 2:11,60 Minuten slower than the first-place Austrian Claudia Lösch and 1:09,02 Minutes faster than Gyöngyi Dani from Hungary, who placed ninth.
 Four skiers of the Krücken skiing came not into the goal, and 45 of the total of 117 skiers in the giant slalom could not place themselves.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh have found the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The deputy Inspector-General D. K. Arya said,
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanja, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The police chief, Chandra Shekhar Solanki,
 Although three people were in the house when the car crashed,
 The driver, however, suffered severe head injuries.
 The road on which the accident occurred was temporarily closed, while the rescue services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was first taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya was in the meantime charged with the murder of her son.
 She is in custody until the charges are brought and the trial is held,
 This is common practice in Britain,
 Professor Pamela Ferguson from the University of Dundee says,
 The Crown Prosecution Service, which is leading the prosecution, has indicated to journalists that it will not be making any further comments until the trial.
 The document refers to the border dispute, in which the Palestinians demand a return to the borders of the West Bank and the Gaza Strip prior to the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other topics that are supposedly covered include the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel wants a military presence in the Jordan Valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the Palestinian authority wants such a presence only for five years.
 The Schützen of the accompanying experiment to the end of the plague should be closely watched by the rankers,
 Within the framework of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn,
 Martelly has sworn in a new provisional electoral Council with nine members.
 It's Martelly's fifth CEP within four years.
 Last month, a Presidency Committee recommended the resignation of the previous Ceo as part of a package of measures to steer the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was Martelly's response to the widespread regime-critical protests that began in October.
 The trigger for the sometimes violent protests was the failure to hold elections, which had been scheduled for some time.
 Over 60 cases of Overheating have been reported,
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry,
 Last week, METI announced that it had been informed by apple of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company described as not being serious.
 The Ministry reacted by describing the delay as a real shame.
 The earthquake struck Mariana at 07:19 am local time.
 No damage was reported.
 Also, the Pacific Tsunami warning center had said there were no indications of a Tsunami.
 A former Philippine policeman has taken tourists from Hong Kong as hostages,
 Rolando Mendoza shot at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and there are at least six confirmed deaths.
 Six hostages, including the children and the elderly, were released early.
 The photographers took the place of an older lady,
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and became a medical doctor.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and took up a position at the National women's hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 During his work at the hospital,
 His research showed that the use of a hormone accelerated the maturation of the lungs.
 According to the report,
 And ringers also paid tribute to Luna.
 And then,
 Dustin „Goldust“ Runnels gave the following comment: „Luna was just as crazy as I was, maybe even crazier.
 Since 2008, the proportion of those who oppose Australia becoming a Republic has increased by 8 per cent.
 The then acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard,
 Forty four percent of Australians want Elizabeth to be the last.
 Twenty nine percent of those surveyed said Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible,
 The gold medallist at the Olympic games should swim at the Commonwealth games in the disciplines of 100 and 200 metres freestyle as well as in three relay events, but because of his many ailments his fitness was doubted.
 He was not able to take the medication he needed to overcome his pain, because it was banned at the Commonwealth games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 A lot of people confirmed the discovery using different hardware and software.
 Comets were possibly a source of water for the earth, along with organic matter that can form proteins and make life possible.
 So, for example,
 Cuomo, who took office earlier this year,
 He described the rumors as political nonsense and nonsense.
 It is speculated that he could run for the office of President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that the FAA claims would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel every year,
 It relies on satellite-based technology instead of the older technology based on ground radar, in order to enable air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more precisely and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transportation will be provided, and the surface trains will not stop at Wembley.
 With the concern about lacking transportation possibilities,
 A study published in the Journal Science on Thursday reported the emergence of a new bird species on the Ecuadorian Galápagos Islands.
 Researchers at Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species had developed within only two generations, although it had previously been thought that this process would take much longer due to the mating between a native Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and the introduced cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be processed into various forms.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be twisted and woven.
 It can be made very thin and stuck onto other metal.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical.
 The ink changes its color, depending on how sour or how alkaline the chemical is.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions in the tested chemicals.
 Hydrogen ions are protons to which electrons have been stripped.
 Mix the two dry powders together,
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels kind of weird,
 In almost every house,
 Remnants of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities on Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 In the Roman culture,
 When you call someone who's thousands of miles away,
 The satellite in space receives the call and then almost immediately reflects it back down to earth.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket.
 It takes a gigantic rocket,
 The wheel has changed the world in an incredible way.
 It has brought us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Among them are cats of medium size,
 There are also many small cats,
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche, a special task that each cat has and that ensures that it does not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social cats.
 The packs consist of one to three related adult males,
 Women usually have a close relationship with each other when they live in a large family with sisters and daughters.
 Like wolves or dogs,
 As a versatile athlete, the tiger can climb,
 The tiger belongs to the same group as lions, Leopards, and Jaguars.
 The roar of the tiger sounds not so much like the full-throated roar of the lion,
 Ocelots eat small animals. If they can, they will steal monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Ozelot,
 You can see in the dark with night vision,
 If a small group of living things,
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population needs different features or adaptations in order to be a strong competitor than what it used to be.
 The original population has not changed at all.
 With time, the new population begins to adapt to its new environment,
 After tens or even millions of years, two populations look so different that they can no longer be classified as the same species.
 This process is called speciation,
 Plants generate oxygen, which humans breathe in, and they take in the carbon dioxide that humans breathe out.
 Plants produce their food through Photosynthesis.
 We build our houses out of plants and make our clothes out of plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the largest predator of its time,
 His long fangs were equipped with more than seventy sharp teeth, plus a set of fangs on the palate, which meant that no animal could escape if it crossed his path.
 We don't know for sure, but he could have had a forked tongue.
 He also grabbed everything that came into the water,
 While the majority of their food was known,
 Another difference was that the poor people and the women ate their food sitting down,
 Dishes of the old Romans could contain no foods that came from America or Asia to Europe in later centuries.
 They had no maize, no tomatoes, no potatoes,
 The Babylonians built a temple to each of their gods,
 And the priests attempted to appease the gods by ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had an open courtyard,
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers,
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East,
 The largest part of the Hebrew family's life took place out of doors.
 The women cooked in the yard. Businesses consisted of open shops.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, so that wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. In the old Norse Sagas, it is said that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder. As he continued to travel West, he found Greenland and gave it the name Greenland.
 But independently of his discovery,
 Although all the countries were “Scandinavian”, there were many differences between the peoples, the Kings, the customs, and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie, the temple,
 That's not true.
 On the back of the Declaration of independence, the words,
 It is, however, known,
 It is also possible that the remark was added as a simple identification.
 The landing at D-Day and the fighting that followed liberated northern France, but the South was still not free.
 He was controlled by the Vichy French.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France.
 After only two weeks, the Americans and the French liberation troops had liberated the South of France and were heading towards Germany.
 A civilization is a distinctive culture,
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city state, and which also defines the size of a society.
 A civilized culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a continuing cultural footprint, and a proper distribution.
 Smaller cultures often disappear without leaving relevant historical records,
 During the revolutionary struggles,
 The Congress, however,
 He had no power to enact tax laws or to set tariffs.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all the states,
 The Italian national football team is, together with the German national football team, the second most successful national football team in the world.
 To the popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, Cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor racing.
 Winter sports are the most popular in the northern regions,
 Japan has about 7,000 Islands,
 Japan is often referred to as an Archipelago.
 The beginning of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors sailed past the island and documented its name as Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 1624, the Dutch East India company founded a settlement in the Southwest of Taiwan, thereby initiating a change in the rice and sugar plantation methods of the aboriginal people and employing Chinese workers on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In the year 1683, Qing dynasty forces,
 The Qing dynasty government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki,
 Machu Picchu consists mainly of three buildings, namely the Intihuatana, the sun temple, and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and the restoration work continues today.
 For example, the world's most widely used still image format is 35 mm, which corresponds to the predominant film size at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but even more importantly,
 Exactly,
 The page ratio of this format is twelve to sixteen.
 Many common formats, like the APS format family, for example,
 The much-discussed and often derided Drittel-Rule is a simple guideline that creates dynamism and at the same time preserves a measure of order in a picture.
 It says that the intersection point of the lines that divide a picture vertically and horizontally is the most effective place for the main motif.
 In this period of European history, the Catholic Church,
 For over a thousand years,
 His Omnipotence controlled every one, from the King to the peasant.
 One of the important Christian beliefs says that wealth should be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and that's exactly why the churches have money.
 For more than a thousand years,
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities,
 The strategy proved effective,
 Britain, however,
 Da the reaction to this tactic was limited,
 In the 1920s, pacifism and isolation were the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and countries.
 After the experience of the horrors and atrocities of the first World War,
 In the year eighteen eighty four,
 He came to the USA with four cents in his pocket, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 Each dynasty had its own name.
 Between the individual dynasties,
 In these times, bitter wars were fought among many lords,
 The time of the three kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China.
 There are a lot of social and political effects,
 Also, after the revolution, all professions were open to all male applicants, so that the most ambitious and the best could succeed.
 The same goes for the military,
 The French Revolution inspired many oppressed people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Mohammed was very interested in things that went beyond this everyday life. He often visited a cave that was known as Hira, on the mountain of Nur,
 The cave itself has outlived the times and offers a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 The cave is on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca,
 But it's not easy to find.
 Man sees nothing but the clear, beautiful sky,
 The Cheops pyramid is the only one of the seven world wonders, which still stands today.
 In the third century B.C.
 The Giza plateau, or Giza necropolis,
 The great pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops,
 The “Aufstrich” symbol looks like a V, and the “Abstrich” symbol looks like a Klammer or a square with the bottom line missing.
 So, if you're going to start at the top,
 The stroke generally generates a softer tone, while the stroke is stronger and more expressive.
 You can add your own pencil markings,
 The panicked King Louis the fourteenth,
 They traveled back to Paris, surrounded by a screaming mob of people,
 The mob forced the King and the queen to open the windows of their coaches wide.
 At some point,
 The war expenses of the U S . Imperialists in conquering the Philippines were borne by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime,
 Of course, the super profits,
 To understand the Templars,
 The epoch in which the events took place is commonly designated as the high Middle Ages, a period in European history that lasted from the eleventh to the thirteenth centuries.
 The early Middle Ages preceded the high Middle Ages, which were followed by the late Middle Ages, which ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas, from the technology push or the technological imperative, to the strict sense that human destiny is determined by an underlying logic that is associated with scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 The two general ideas shared by most Technological Determinists are that the development of technology follows a path that is largely beyond cultural or political influence, and that technology itself has effects on societies that are more inherent than social.
 One might argue that the automobile inevitably brings with it the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network is not economically viable for only a small number of cars.
 The widespread ownership of automobiles also leads to a higher number of accidents on the roads, which in turn leads to the invention of new techniques in the health care industry to repair damaged bodies.
 The romanticism had a strong, culturally deterministic element, which drew on writers like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, it is geography that formed individuals. With time, customs and cultures arose that related to this geography, and these, because they were in harmony with the place of society, were better than arbitrarily oktroyated laws.
 So, as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the world today,
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 A.D. and lasted until around 1100 A.D.
 His status declined in the course of the twelfth century, which was mainly due to the fact that the crusaders returned with gifts such as silk and spices, which were regarded as more valuable than the offerings of the Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the title of the fashion capital of the world also wandered from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its height between the 10th and 11th centuries.
 At the beginning, the clothing was strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture in the East.
 But in the West,
 At the end of the Middle Ages,
 Agriculture is the production of food,
 The subsistence economy is a simple, often biological, form of agriculture that uses saved, locally adapted seed and combines it with rotational crop systems or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 In the past, most farmers practiced subsistence farming,
 Subcultures bring like-minded people together who feel neglected by societal norms, and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished from other subcultures by age, ethnicity, class, location, and or gender.
 The characteristics that define a subculture as such may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, or geographic in nature, or a combination of these factors.
 The members of a Subculture often signal their membership through an unmistakable and symbolic style, which includes fashion, habits, and jargon.
 One of the most common methods of illustrating the importance of socialization is to rely on the few unfortunate cases of children who, because of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their childhood.
 Some of these children were kept by humans,
 Wolfskinder have possibly experienced massive childhood abuse or traumatic experiences before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some of them have been raised by animals.
 If it was completely raised by animals,
 While project-based learning makes the learning process easier and more interesting,
 Scaffolding is not a method of learning, but rather a support that helps individuals in a new learning situation, such as when using a new computer program or when beginning a new project.
 So Gerüsts can be virtual,
 Virtual assistance is built into the software and is supposed to question, suggest, and explain work steps that the student alone might not be able to accomplish.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse,
 No child should be forced to grow up in an environment that is not caring, loving, and education oriented, but many are.
 For us, the system of care is a piece of security for these kids.
 Our foster care system should provide a safe home, loving caregivers, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 The foster home should cover all the needs that they didn't get in the home that they were removed from.
 The Internet connects both elements of mass communication,
 The specificities of the Internet have led to additional dimensions in terms of the utility and reward approach.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as important motivations for Internet use.
 And these were identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord,
 The use of Video recordings led to important insights for the interpretation of Micro-Expressions,
 Especially it is claimed that one can recognize whether someone is lying by correctly interpreting minimal changes in the expression of the face.
 In his article, the President's speech, Oliver Sacks showed how people who can't understand language anymore,
 He even argues that the ability to interpret human behavior,
 There are two pools of genetic variation.
 Mutation creates new genetic Variations,
 Mixing and matching between the two pools with every generation.
 It is hard for a primate with a human-like digestive system to get its amino acids from the available plant sources.
 It has serious consequences if you don't.
 The most easily accessible plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes,
 In contrast to this, animal food sources, such as ants, termites, and eggs,
 Overall, it shouldn't surprise us that our own ancestors solved their protein problem in a similar way to how chimpanzees in the Savanna do today.
 The process of waking up during normal sleep periods and falling asleep shortly thereafter.
 This can be done by using a relatively quiet alarm clock,
 If you're someone who SETS the alarm,
 Another way to manipulate your biorhythm is to drink a lot of liquid before bed,
 The degree of inner calm,
 The less tension, the more positive the life force.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negativity.
 The Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha,
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple.
 With Kundalini-Yoga the Kundalini-Energy is awakened through Yoga-Poses, breathing exercises, Mantras and Visualisations.
 In the center of Tibetan meditation stands the deity yoga.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. After the war, the collision of the systems, the course and culture led to the countries becoming estranged.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 He should have lasted the next 40 years and in reality,
 On the seventeenth of September, 1939, the Polish defense had already collapsed, and the only hope was in a retreat and a new formation along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans, however, became obsolete almost overnight,
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient method of transporting large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The task of the Navy was traditionally to ensure that a country remains able to transport people and goods, and at the same time to hinder the enemy's ability to transport people and goods.
 One of the most important examples of this is the North Atlantic campaign during the second World War.
 At the same time, the German Navy tried to stop this traffic mainly with U-Boats.
 If the Allies had failed,
 Goats were apparently already domesticated in the Zagros mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 As soon as they began to use them as beasts of burden,
 The goats were usually kept in herds,
 Soon in the sixteen hundreds,
 Although the supporting rails consisted only of parallel wooden boards,
 Soon, however, it became clear that rails,
 This was usual, but the iron caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, the wooden rails were replaced by iron rails.
 The first known way of moving was walking.
 Your predecessors, the Australopithecus,
 Two-Toed species are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as seven million years ago.
 We can live in a more environmentally friendly way,
 But in many cases,
 It is really obvious that the world has changed a lot due to the scientific and technological advancements of humanity, and that the problems of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of humans have become much more serious.
 After his farewell address to the Congress,
 In the course of the night, between one hundred and two hundred copies were made,
 The first public reading of the document was given by John Nixon in the courtyard of Independence hall on July 8.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6,
 The 25 Dunlap-Broadside copies that still exist are the oldest copies that still exist.
 Many Paleontologists today believe that there is a group of dinosaurs that survived and are still living today.
 Many people don't see them as dinosaurs,
 But many things about birds still look like dinosaurs.
 They have feet with scales and claws,
 Almost all computers used today,
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, namely 0 or 1, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or Binary digits, to use the computer jargon.
 A hidden poisoning may not be immediately apparent. The symptoms, for example, vomiting, are so general that one cannot immediately make a diagnosis.
 The best sign of poisoning by swallowing is the presence of an open container with medicines or toxic household chemicals.
 Look on the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term “Wasps” is used by Entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from the ancient familiarity with bedbugs.
 Both the robber and the bed bug are nidicol,
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most widespread neurological disease in adults, young and middle-aged.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord, and the optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely to get MS as men.
 A couple can decide that it's not in their own interest or in the interest of their child to raise a baby.
 These couples can choose to adopt a baby.
 When a child is adopted,
 The main goal of science is to use the scientific method to figure out how the world works.
 It's not just about experimenting,
 Naturally,
 Aristotle's views on all branches of knowledge, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the loss of Greek language,
 Many observed rhythms in physiology and behavior often depend to a large extent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 From a cycle,
 Biological clocks are self-contained oscillators that even in the absence of external signals will continue to oscillate for a time.
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the defining pieces of evidence that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used Phages or viruses,
 They did two experiments,
 Mutations can have a variety of effects, depending on what kind of Mutation it is, what the significance of the piece of genetic material is, and whether the cells in question are germ cells.
 Only Mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while Mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 People who are interested in nature,
 Examples of on-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks, and learning about the ecosystem.
 One example of this is the visit,
 Every morning, people leave small provincial towns in their cars to go to work, and they are passed by others whose workplace is the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic Pendulum traffic,
 The science now points to the fact that this massive carbon-based economy has brought the biosphere out of one of its stable states,
 Everyone takes part in the society and uses transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you'll rarely hear about the water quality or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems fail?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between them.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flows is difficult,
 Unfortunately, however,
 To better illustrate the traffic flow,
 These relationships help with the planning,
 Insects were the first animals to conquer the sky.
 Most insects can fold their wings back along their body.
 Through this, they have a wider selection of small hiding places in which they can hide from predators.
 Today, dragonflies and mayflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 For thousands of years,
 Many people thought that he was right,
 It seems reasonable, doesn't it?
 The Amazon is the second longest and the second largest river in the world.
 The Amazon is also the widest River in the world,
 Whole 20 percent of the water that flows into the oceans of the planet comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Although the building of pyramids out of stone was continued until the end of the old empire,
 Egyptians in the ancient new Kingdom admired the monuments of their ancestors, which were then well over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city has about 800 inhabitants.
 The Vatican city uses Italian for its legislation and official communication.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most who work in the state, while Latin is often used at religious ceremonies.
 All the citizens of Vatican city are Roman Catholics.
 Gold, silver, and copper,
 All things are made up of the four elements.
 This matched the four States of aggregation,
 There are two or more Metals.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals.
 There are also alloys,
 The universe consists of matter.
 Atoms are so tiny that billions of them would fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 Therefore, the pencil became a good friend to many people.
 Unfortunately, the pencil has been pushed into the background with the advent of newer writing methods, so that it has been pushed into the background in its status and in its use.
 Nowadays, people write messages on computer screens without ever having to come close to a typewriter.
 One may be anxious to see what will come out of the keyboard.
 The atomic bomb is based on the principle that you need energy to bring together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons.
 So, roughly,
 Some atoms have unstable cores, which means that they will decay at the slightest touch.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rock and dust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and about 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the sea and thicker under the highlands.
 On the Nahside, there could be more Maria, because the crust is thinner.
 Internal theories focus on finding what moves or appeals to people.
 These theories suggest that humans have certain needs and or desires that are internalized over the course of their adulthood.
 These theories are concerned with what makes certain people want to do exactly the things they do, and what influences in their environment cause them to do or not to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's theory of the need hierarchy and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, there are two ways that managers can behave when they start to lead their former colleagues.
 This kind of manager has problems,
 At the other end of the spectrum,
 Ultimately, the team leader is responsible for the team's success and failure.
 This behavior often leads to a breakdown in the relationship between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are run according to the same excellence standards as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members,
 The presence of a real invisible team
 And the invisible team,
 Why would an organization undertake the time-consuming process of introducing a learning organization?
 When all available resources are effectively utilized across all departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can flourish.
 In the end, the joint work of an organization can lead to a new innovative method of meeting customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, the leadership must develop a culture of innovation,
 Angel (2006) explains the continuum concept as a method to help organizations become more efficient.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various kinds of brain damage, such as trauma, injury and tumors,
 Newly emerging Technologies allow us to see and to explore certain brain structures and processes.
 That gives us a lot of information and material to build Simulation models that help us to understand what's going on in our heads.
 KI will be strongly associated with science fiction, but it is an important branch of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research in the field of ai includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are steering, the setting of strategies and timetables, the ability to answer customer questions and queries, as well as handwriting, voice and facial recognition.
 Such things have become to be independent disciplines,
 The KI system is today often used in the areas of business, medicine, engineering and the military, and it has also been incorporated into numerous software applications for home computers and video games.
 Excursions are an important part of every school class. Not seldom a teacher would like to take her or his pupils to places which cannot be reached by bus.
 A virtual excursion is a technical solution. The students can look at museum pieces from the classroom, visit an Aquarium, or admire beautiful works of art.
 A virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year,
 Blogs can also help to improve the writing skills of students.
 So, as a result,
 The Blogging,
 Blogging is a tool that inspires cooperation and encourages students to continue learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of Blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical. By reacting to Internet materials, students can define their own positions in the context of other texts and can articulate their own perspectives on specific topics.
 Ottawa is Canada's beauteous, bilingual capital and is marked by a number of art galleries and museums that present Canada's past and present.
 Further South are the Niagara falls,
 All of these things and more,
 Great areas further North are sparsely populated,
 A population comparison that many are surprised by,
 The East African Islands are in the Indian ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and, as regards the animal world, a continent in itself.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations or belong to France,
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the country, and in the Comoros and Mayotte it was very successful.
 The European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese seafarer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 In the North, it is bordered by the Sahel zone,
 It is recommended that all female travelers claim to be married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 Also, wearing a ring is helpful.
 Women should recognize that cultural differences can lead to what they would consider an assault, and that it's not unusual to be chased, grabbed,
 Stay consistent, when you turn men down, and don't be afraid to defend your position.
 The present Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, before the beginning of the time, and was used by the Phoenicians, the Romans and the Merinides as a strategic port with the name of Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Casa Branca,
 The city was rebuilt by the Moroccan Sultan as Dar el Beida, and it was renamed Casablanca by Spanish traders who established a trading post there.
 Casablanca is one of the most uninteresting places to shop in all of Morocco.
 Around the old Medina,
 Goma is a tourist town in the Democratic Republic of the Congo,
 In the year 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, in particular, the city center.
 While Goma is somewhat safe,
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of the Nyiragongo volcano and for some of the cheapest gorilla tracking tours in Africa.
 You can use Bodabodas,
 This, combined with its relative inaccessibility, has led to Timbuktu becoming a metaphor for exotic, far-off lands.
 Although Timbuktu is known as a tourist attraction,
 In the year 1990, it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 It was one of the most important stations of Louis Gates PBS special,
 The city stands in stark contrast to the rest of the cities in the country, because it has more of an Arabic than an African feel.
 The Kruger National Park lies in northeastern South Africa. It borders Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the North, and the Crocodile River to the South.
 The park has an area of 19,500 square kilometers and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different animal world.
 He is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is regarded as the flagship of South African National Parks.
 Like all South African National Parks,
 It can also be worthwhile to buy a Wild Card, which gives you access to selected parks in South Africa or to all South African National parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the name giver for the territory of Hong Kong and stands in the middle of the tourist center.
 The buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline have been compared to a shimmering bar chart that becomes visible through the presence of Victoria Harbour's waters.
 For the best view of Hongkong,
 The bulk of Hong Kong Island's urbanization is dense and packed along the North Coast.
 This is the place that the British colonists made their own.
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove forest in the world,
 The Sundarbans were declared a UNESCO world heritage site. The part of the forest that lies within the Indian state is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are not only Mangrove swamps,
 The Sundarbans stretch over an area of 3,850 square kilometers,
 The Sundarbans have been a nature reserve since 1966, and estimates suggest that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave all day long from the district-wide bus station,
 So, if you're going to be in the city,
 Most of the districts are served by small Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and stable.
 The two routes,
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a cantilever bridge. It spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 Their two towers are 83 meters high,
 The height of the bridge is 15 meters.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational by September 2017.
 The Guarani were the most important indigenous group that inhabited present-day East Paraguay.
 The Chaco region was also home to other groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called the great province of the West Indies,
 The Spanish began the colonizing period, which lasted three hundred years.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on Las Cañitas Polofields.
 Smaller tournaments and competitions can also be viewed at other times of the year.
 Information about competitions and places to buy Polo tickets can be found at the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Pound, which is pegged to the value of the British pound sterling.
 The only Bank on the Island is in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 Now, the British pound is basically accepted everywhere on the Islands and at Stanley.
 On the remote Islands, credit cards are unlikely to be accepted, although British and U S . currency may be accepted, so inquire in advance with the owners, which method of payment is accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands themselves, so you should exchange the money before you leave the Islands.
 Da Montevideo,
 Montevideo lies in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures of over 30 ° C are usual.
 The winter can be deceptively cold.
 There are no distinct rainy or dry seasons.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people,
 According to the park authority,
 However, peaceful Bison, Wapitis, Elk, bears, and practically all large animals can,
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they don't keep enough distance.
 Be aware that smells can attract bears and other wildlife.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa,
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The harbor was the scene of an ignominious naval battle in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Great Britain refused to leave the harbor.
 All but one British cruiser was sunk.
 During the Mau movement,
 There are two main areas.
 The beaches of North Shore lie on the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Most of them are sandy beaches with safe swimming and most of them offer shade from Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki drive are located at the port of Waitemata, in the upper-class suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 There are family beaches that are sometimes overcrowded, with a nice shopping promenade along the coast. Swimming is safe here.
 The most important local beer is called number one.
 There are many French wines to drink, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better tolerated.
 The local tap water is fine to drink, but if you're worried, you can also find bottled water.
 A small, dark coffee.
 The hot chocolate is Belgian,
 Many trips to the Reef happen all year round, and injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 However, you should follow the advice of authorities,
 Würfelquallen occur in the vicinity of beaches and river mouths from October to April, north of 1770.
 Sharks exist, but they rarely bite humans.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live in the sea,
 A booking in advance gives the traveler the certainty that he will have a place to stay when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with specific hotels, although you may also be able to book other accommodation through a travel agency, such as a tent site.
 Reisebüros usually offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 You can also hold your reservation for you,
 Any changes or requests should be directed to the travel agency and not to the hotel.
 At many festivals, the majority of festival goers decide to camp on site, and most festival goers think this is an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action,
 Think about it,
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the northern East Sea in winter,
 The cruises to St Petersburg also offer time for a stay in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement.
 In the casino,
 You usually have a special offer of food, drinks, and entertainment to keep the guests happy and to make sure they stay.
 Some gambling venues offer free alcoholic beverages.
 Whoever travels in high latitudes or over mountain passes should reckon with snow, ice and temperatures below freezing point.
 On roads that are wet and icy,
 In a snowstorm,
 The visibility can also be impaired by falling or drifting snow, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.
 On the other hand,
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the highlight for many visitors.
 The term Safari,
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes,
 Lions, Leopards, and Leopards are often shy and you can better observe them with a telescope.
 A Footing safari, also called a Bushwalk,
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021. Some events will be held at other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic summer games, after having hosted the first in 1964.
 If you've booked your flights and accommodation for the year 2020 before the postponement was announced, you could find yourself in a difficult situation.
 But most of the cancellation policies,
 It is estimated that the most expensive tickets will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen,
 To ironing clothes.
 If no ironing board is available,
 Be careful that the fabric doesn't get too hot.
 There are several ways to clean water.
 In some areas, it's enough to boil water for one minute,
 The effectiveness of filters varies greatly, and if you have any concerns, then you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may stumble upon animal pests that they are unfamiliar with from their home regions.
 Pests can destroy food, cause irritation, or in the worst case, even cause allergic reactions, poison, or transmit diseases.
 Infections as such or dangerous animals that can hurt or kill humans are usually not classified as pests.
 Duty-Free shopping is the ability to buy goods that are exempt from certain taxes and duties.
 Travellers whose destination has a high tax rate can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on products like alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmount on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway is the greatest driving challenge,
 If you're not used to driving on country roads,
 The indicated speed limits are markedly lower than in the preceding and following sections,
 But, interestingly,
 German Backwaren are quite tasty. In Bavaria they are quite nutritious and varied, just like in the neighboring country of Austria.
 Obstgebäck is widely used, with apples being cooked all year round, and cherries and plums being used in the summer.
 Many German baked goods contain almonds, hazelnuts, or other nuts.
 If you want to make small, but rich, Backwaren, then try what is called Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish that is based on herbs and spices, together with either meat or vegetables.
 A Curry can be either dry or wet, depending on the amount of liquid.
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries,
 With a selection of 17,000 Islands, Indonesian food is an umbrella term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines found all over the country.
 However, if the term is used without further attributes,
 The Javanese cuisine, which is today widespread throughout the island group, offers a variety of simply seasoned dishes. As a taste carrier, the Javanese prefer to use peanuts, chili, sugar and a number of aromatic herbs.
 Side-Reins are aids for the feet of the rider, which hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They give the rider more stability, but there are safety concerns because the rider's feet could get caught in them.
 If a rider falls off his horse,
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, narrow sole.
 Some saddles, especially English saddles,
 The Cochamó Valley,
 The peaks offer a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world discover new routes along the walls, which offer endless possibilities.
 A sport like skiing and snowboarding are popular sports in which one attaches skis or a snowboard to one's feet and slides down a snow-covered slope.
 Skiing is a popular vacation activity with many enthusiasts, sometimes also known as a ski penner, who plan their entire vacation around skiing at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old.
 The origins of skiing as a sport go back at least to the seventeenth century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Skiing with a backpack.
 It resembles alpine touring,
 Consider the skirting route as a comparable hiking route.
 At good conditions, you are able to cover somewhat greater distances than when hiking,
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has numerous independent countries. Normally, one would have to apply for multiple visas and go through several passport controls when traveling through several countries.
 In this respect, however, the Schengen area functions a little bit like a country.
 So long as one remains in this zone,
 You do not have to apply for a visa
 There is no generally valid definition of what constitutes an antique.
 The definition has geographic deviations,
 Handmade products could be called antique, even though they are younger than similar products from mass production.
 The reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around the trade is also important for many who work in other professions.
 Also in the past, not all Sámi have raised reindeer in a large way, but have lived from fishing, hunting and similar things.
 Today, many Sámi work in modern professions.
 Even though the term ""Zigeuner"" is used,
 If a travel warning is issued for the country you are visiting,
 You can also consult the advice of other governments.
 For example,
 Debates are only a short summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are often superficial, general, and in comparison to the more detailed information that can be found elsewhere,
 Weather is the umbrella term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Weather can occur anywhere in the world,
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of a storm, just like thunderstorms, tornadoes, water hoses and whirlwinds.
 Regional and seasonal weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms, and dust storms.
 Travellers are urged to pay attention to any kind of weather that affects their area, as this can have an impact on all travel plans.
 Everyone who plans to travel to a war zone should have professional training.
 And it will probably show you the address of a local company.
 A course covers all the problems discussed here in much more detail,
 A course is usually between two and five days long and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 There are a lot of books and journals on survival in the wilderness,
 Travellers who plan to have a gender-affirming operation abroad must ensure that they have valid travel documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports with an unspecified gender marker,
 The willingness of foreign governments to acknowledge these documents is also very different.
 The searches at security controls have become much more intrusive since the attacks of September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people should not expect their privacy and dignity to be intact when they pass through the scanners.
 Rip currents are the returning tide of waves that break on the shore,
 Because of the underwater topography,
 Most deaths occur when people try to swim against the current.
 When one gets out of the current,
 Try to get somewhere where you won't be caught again.
 The return shock comes earlier than the culture shock,
 Travellers, who find it easy to adapt to a new culture,
 When one comes home after a foreign trip,
 As you first traveled abroad,
 Perhaps, however,
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions for children in the neighborhood.
 You can see the pyramids in the darkness,
 Now, normally,
 The Sphinx is used as a background and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are depicted on the pyramids,
 The Southern Shetland Islands, which were discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most stations. In 2020, sixteen were active.
 The largest is King George Island, with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Further Islands are Livingston Island and Deception, where the flooded Caldera of an still active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworthland is the region south of the Halbinsel, which is bounded by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula here merge into the plateau and then rise again to form the 360-kilometer-long Ellsworth range, which is divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part or the Sentinel Range has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, whose highest peak is Mount Vinson, at 4,892 m.
 In remote areas without Handy coverage,
 A satellite phone is generally no substitute for a mobile phone,
 The service is often used by ships, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that need data and voice connections.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you further information about the service.
 One of the most popular options for people who are planning to take a year off,
 This is especially popular with school leavers,
 In many cases, participation in a foreign gap year program can actually improve your chances of getting into college.
 In general, a tuition fee is charged for the registration to these educational programs.
 Finland is a great destination for boating. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of Islands,
 You don't need a yacht for the archipelago and the lakes.
 Even if the coastal Island groups and the largest lakes are actually large enough for any yacht,
 Boating is the national pastime in Finland,
 This is comparable to Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but otherwise quite unique.
 Most pure Baltic cruises include a longer stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 You can visit the historic town for several whole days,
 If you only go ashore during the cruise,
 Some cruise lines offer Berlin as a destination on their brochures. As you can see on the map, Berlin is far from the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flights can be a daunting experience for people of any age and from any walk of life, especially if they've never flown before or have had a traumatic experience.
 For that, one must not be ashamed.
 To learn more about the functioning of airplanes and the procedures during a flight can help some people to overcome the fear that is associated with the unknown or with the feeling of not having any control.
 For the quick delivery of things,
 On some routes, the larger firms used their own planes,
 When they sent things via air freight,
 The only way to get it through,
 The obvious method, in first or business class,
 As a rough rule of thumb, you can expect to pay
 In general, it is pointless to look for discounts on direct flights from A to B, even for business or first-class seats.
 The airlines know very well that there is a certain core group of people who are willing to pay a lot of money to get to their destination quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic,
 1994 led to the founding of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations,
 The most important religion in Moldova is the Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the second largest port after Istanbul, and a very good transportation hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna is today a modern, progressive, and busy business center, which lies at the mouth of a great Bay and is surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, glazed buildings and modern shopping centres are marked by classic red tile roofs, the market from the eighteenth century, as well as old mosques and churches, although the city emits more of a Mediterranean atmosphere than that of traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers a view of the nearby Island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 On the cemetery there are some interesting marble sculptures of pigeons.
 It is worth while to wander through the fascinating village.
 In the North and in the immediate vicinity lies the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became known to foreigners after Lord Byron had described its splendor in glowing colors.
 The Scotturb-Bus 403 regularly runs over Cabo da Roca to Sintra.
 Also visit in the North the great shrine of Our Lady of the Rosary of Fatima,
 Please bear in mind that you are basically visiting a mass grave as well as a place that has an almost incalculable significance for a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who have survived the time here, and many more with relatives who were murdered there or worked to death, Jews and Non-Jews alike.
 Please treat this place with the dignity, the awe, and the respect that it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish.
 Most of the signs are only in Catalan,
 And yet,
 Normal announcements are made in Catalan, but unforeseen disruptions are reported by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be egotistical, rude, and arrogant.
 So, in Paris,
 The harsh exterior of the Parisian disappears quite quickly,
 The Plitvice National Park is heavily forested,
 He has a remarkable variety of plant communities,
 The area is also home to a huge variety of animal and bird species.
 There are rarely seen European Brown bears, wolves, Eagles, Owls, lynx, Wildcats and Eurasian Eagle Owls as well as many commonly found species.
 When visiting the monasteries, women must wear skirts that reach to the knee, and also cover their shoulders.
 In most monasteries, there are Wrap-Around skirts for women who come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially one in bright colors, the monk or nun at the entrance will give you a smile.
 And so,
 Also these can be borrowed from the collection, but the clothing will not be washed after every user, so you may not feel comfortable in these pants.
 Like the cuisine of the Mediterranean,
 A simple, popular evening meal, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: Bread with olive oil, tomatoes, and any other available ingredients such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 Um all substantives,
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 But it makes it a bit easier to read.
 The Italian pronunciation is relatively easy,
 The most important letters to pay attention to are C and G,
 And so,
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and largely regular grammar.
 So, therefore,
 When one speaks a romance language,
 People who speak some Spanish, however,
 Today, however,
 During the high phase of light pollution,
 Most modern research telescopes are huge,
 The viewing of cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept originated in China, where peach blossoms were the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first Cherry Blossom Festivals were held by the Emperor only for himself and other nobles in the Emperor's court.
 But don't remove it.
 When one visits a formally laid out garden and collects samples,
 Singapore is generally a very safe place,
 So you're in the extreme Tropics,
 There are also a few buses that go North to Hebron,
 Make sure the bus you're taking goes to Hebron, not Kiryat Arba.
 Inner-Harbour waterways can be a good basis for vacation planning.
 For example,
 They also show popular hiking and biking routes.
 In Christianity, Christmas is one of the most important holidays and is considered the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions around the holiday have been adopted by Non-Believers,
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night
 There are of course theological explanations for this tradition, but it could also be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 Traditionally, churches hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night,
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands,
 Because of the great distance from the continent,
 Since the first humans entered the Galapagos Islands,
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in the winter,
 This offers a good opportunity to see the northern lights,
 So,
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners might be used to.
 Suits count as business attire, and colleagues address each other by their last names or job titles.
 The harmony at the workplace is of decisive importance, where the focus is rather on the group performance than on the praise for individual achievements.
 Oftentimes, employees have to get the approval of their supervisors for any decision they make, and it's expected that they will follow their bosses' instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.21778923954731866, 'precisions': [0.6739714320595775, 0.4227065712426806, 0.2921019640618471, 0.20711610486891385], 'brevity_penalty': 0.6010757539131836, 'length_ratio': 0.6626754581125359, 'translation_length': 16382, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 44.70996619607316, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.7280798527769184, 'scores': [0.5626593232154846, 0.34281378984451294, 0.8977136015892029, 0.41963431239128113, 0.42633020877838135, 0.5014536380767822, 0.9207803606987, 0.8395827412605286, 0.8551747798919678, 0.9394522309303284, 0.9059465527534485, 0.4133009910583496, 0.7009713053703308, 0.8856244087219238, 0.8627125024795532, 0.8725140690803528, 0.9089083075523376, 0.41127124428749084, 0.8829483985900879, 0.8526982665061951, 0.9252610802650452, 0.850749135017395, 0.42722660303115845, 0.8699937462806702, 0.37120693922042847, 0.9102770090103149, 0.7640082240104675, 0.6980180144309998, 0.7647736072540283, 0.8684511184692383, 0.6663953065872192, 0.6097247004508972, 0.703623354434967, 0.9091809988021851, 0.535544216632843, 0.7960801720619202, 0.4174898564815521, 0.5204648971557617, 0.4163021743297577, 0.8569164872169495, 0.6895748972892761, 0.9134522080421448, 0.8871148228645325, 0.8843638300895691, 0.5195751190185547, 0.40803059935569763, 0.8690312504768372, 0.8266382813453674, 0.36679232120513916, 0.43988969922065735, 0.9276781678199768, 0.9275125861167908, 0.8895601034164429, 0.9235464930534363, 0.9235377907752991, 0.8915768265724182, 0.45368096232414246, 0.4362940490245819, 0.8844724893569946, 0.951173722743988, 0.5067501664161682, 0.9204261302947998, 0.8799832463264465, 0.8220561146736145, 0.8428357243537903, 0.870964765548706, 0.809421956539154, 0.8432230353355408, 0.7862651348114014, 0.8542121648788452, 0.5820591449737549, 0.802361011505127, 0.6441784501075745, 0.8680858016014099, 0.8728011250495911, 0.468427449464798, 0.6757906675338745, 0.3912472426891327, 0.9534547328948975, 0.33283674716949463, 0.9058951735496521, 0.4458078444004059, 0.8442830443382263, 0.795652449131012, 0.4930651783943176, 0.6742606163024902, 0.3025341033935547, 0.8831228017807007, 0.6405747532844543, 0.8212876915931702, 0.6762199997901917, 0.8657078742980957, 0.8843604922294617, 0.9387992024421692, 0.7384610772132874, 0.5582682490348816, 0.902177095413208, 0.6115624308586121, 0.42327210307121277, 0.6906952857971191, 0.9301887154579163, 0.7017331123352051, 0.8926376700401306, 0.9729158282279968, 0.8734580874443054, 0.7216202020645142, 0.9240172505378723, 0.8755562901496887, 0.6713249683380127, 0.8783118724822998, 0.8917551636695862, 0.9268911480903625, 0.97328120470047, 0.7980473041534424, 0.8385145664215088, 0.8037897348403931, 0.683814287185669, 0.4529778063297272, 0.9657866358757019, 0.8078451752662659, 0.4290858805179596, 0.7113761305809021, 0.7824931740760803, 0.9389781951904297, 0.916677713394165, 0.6636053919792175, 0.90071040391922, 0.876369833946228, 0.3329414427280426, 0.6349016427993774, 0.8751142621040344, 0.8872460722923279, 0.9058005213737488, 0.9016943573951721, 0.43499234318733215, 0.636738121509552, 0.8611575365066528, 0.8820222020149231, 0.9533644914627075, 0.68949955701828, 0.8866970539093018, 0.8516377806663513, 0.620895504951477, 0.7404054403305054, 0.5824691653251648, 0.9002851843833923, 0.5943717956542969, 0.9175597429275513, 0.9049379229545593, 0.9070946574211121, 0.6244404315948486, 0.40430256724357605, 0.8882846236228943, 0.5359676480293274, 0.6050472855567932, 0.8801261782646179, 0.8588322997093201, 0.4415622055530548, 0.8404475450515747, 0.9158070683479309, 0.7832323908805847, 0.32457008957862854, 0.6253347992897034, 0.631770670413971, 0.8815800547599792, 0.8726516366004944, 0.7153248190879822, 0.760638415813446, 0.8738560080528259, 0.6354395747184753, 0.8034862875938416, 0.8630492687225342, 0.7749029994010925, 0.45951321721076965, 0.31136876344680786, 0.9346179366111755, 0.8593264818191528, 0.8876842260360718, 0.8648884892463684, 0.6791381239891052, 0.8815478682518005, 0.9215819239616394, 0.9011008143424988, 0.8888989686965942, 0.8992041945457458, 0.7207967042922974, 0.9751046299934387, 0.4986235201358795, 0.7563743591308594, 0.5657041668891907, 0.8879901766777039, 0.48700985312461853, 0.46315431594848633, 0.2968808710575104, 0.6399645209312439, 0.9376240372657776, 0.4792690873146057, 0.5703708529472351, 0.43301382660865784, 0.398932546377182, 0.8340319395065308, 0.7427799105644226, 0.6417978405952454, 0.7498835921287537, 0.903723418712616, 0.8904237151145935, 0.5299890637397766, 0.8819182515144348, 0.7145865559577942, 0.83416748046875, 0.536480724811554, 0.9095191359519958, 0.6098976731300354, 0.7189949154853821, 0.7056811451911926, 0.5854166746139526, 0.8737750053405762, 0.9015660285949707, 0.8545398712158203, 0.8888022303581238, 0.9101599454879761, 0.7463337182998657, 0.7518538236618042, 0.4072871506214142, 0.9335041642189026, 0.8936129212379456, 0.8603934049606323, 0.8597657084465027, 0.9135406613349915, 0.4430619478225708, 0.8753477334976196, 0.4393565356731415, 0.8244588375091553, 0.8755449652671814, 0.3498808443546295, 0.8142558932304382, 0.8956560492515564, 0.48001280426979065, 0.9401164650917053, 0.8888658285140991, 0.80682772397995, 0.7985787987709045, 0.391828328371048, 0.559124767780304, 0.46339499950408936, 0.40014705061912537, 0.43826261162757874, 0.557649552822113, 0.3359888792037964, 0.9426038265228271, 0.9048678874969482, 0.9191102981567383, 0.8083662390708923, 0.9244163632392883, 0.8630911111831665, 0.5549816489219666, 0.9137247204780579, 0.7072908878326416, 0.8894304633140564, 0.8765953183174133, 0.9152811169624329, 0.8442673087120056, 0.5182920694351196, 0.571483314037323, 0.9299737215042114, 0.4666012227535248, 0.48275211453437805, 0.840340256690979, 0.9393212795257568, 0.8276531100273132, 0.7498853206634521, 0.7016627192497253, 0.6853684186935425, 0.36152806878089905, 0.562035083770752, 0.6503967642784119, 0.588469922542572, 0.9026300311088562, 0.531066358089447, 0.9412518739700317, 0.5769030451774597, 0.7481921911239624, 0.9003365635871887, 0.8908359408378601, 0.9066134095191956, 0.920676052570343, 0.804998517036438, 0.6370763182640076, 0.5789162516593933, 0.5303118824958801, 0.8739728331565857, 0.8046914339065552, 0.8984158635139465, 0.8686828017234802, 0.44001534581184387, 0.6864469051361084, 0.43401816487312317, 0.8791206479072571, 0.9198170304298401, 0.861939549446106, 0.9379259943962097, 0.8766534924507141, 0.6119256615638733, 0.5396432280540466, 0.7950028777122498, 0.7962701916694641, 0.8518327474594116, 0.6526739597320557, 0.9163150191307068, 0.7606294751167297, 0.7246370911598206, 0.8991544842720032, 0.8761951327323914, 0.5629034042358398, 0.9321977496147156, 0.8995596766471863, 0.544141948223114, 0.812903881072998, 0.5424796342849731, 0.5569184422492981, 0.3638317883014679, 0.7832992672920227, 0.7906131744384766, 0.4703981578350067, 0.6527102589607239, 0.7093186974525452, 0.8042945265769958, 0.8687652945518494, 0.913990318775177, 0.8076966404914856, 0.916693389415741, 0.31910252571105957, 0.5230580568313599, 0.8061250448226929, 0.9206551313400269, 0.893743634223938, 0.8863967657089233, 0.8065692186355591, 0.5402819514274597, 0.9114989638328552, 0.8676949143409729, 0.7612852454185486, 0.7868125438690186, 0.6791155934333801, 0.7974164485931396, 0.8251234889030457, 0.8961902260780334, 0.737179160118103, 0.675968587398529, 0.7907304167747498, 0.3376527726650238, 0.9129587411880493, 0.463325172662735, 0.7764886021614075, 0.9171451926231384, 0.5920160412788391, 0.6097388863563538, 0.640038251876831, 0.9102505445480347, 0.5543705821037292, 0.5148524641990662, 0.8976891040802002, 0.7804154753684998, 0.7371850609779358, 0.8690997362136841, 0.4935387372970581, 0.5948044657707214, 0.7605517506599426, 0.7266092896461487, 0.7714672088623047, 0.2618737816810608, 0.43537378311157227, 0.40438300371170044, 0.9096745848655701, 0.8066858649253845, 0.7992511987686157, 0.9118483662605286, 0.5762826800346375, 0.874357283115387, 0.7994753122329712, 0.7782329320907593, 0.7612349390983582, 0.7997856140136719, 0.55613774061203, 0.5522608757019043, 0.4298807382583618, 0.6278584003448486, 0.8516709208488464, 0.6555083394050598, 0.859580934047699, 0.78500896692276, 0.618375301361084, 0.6322156190872192, 0.9290506839752197, 0.5323420166969299, 0.8259109854698181, 0.6133562922477722, 0.9374595880508423, 0.8434032797813416, 0.529404878616333, 0.9227102994918823, 0.4825235605239868, 0.5475975871086121, 0.5784716010093689, 0.35855647921562195, 0.8535658717155457, 0.9079997539520264, 0.5016535520553589, 0.8404805660247803, 0.8677601218223572, 0.5295931696891785, 0.8648390173912048, 0.8132962584495544, 0.8500692248344421, 0.4270397126674652, 0.3438630700111389, 0.8012328743934631, 0.6671172380447388, 0.870370090007782, 0.8693239688873291, 0.6850036978721619, 0.7004356980323792, 0.7304079532623291, 0.858289897441864, 0.8299277424812317, 0.4987351596355438, 0.5000200867652893, 0.8986424207687378, 0.933861494064331, 0.9551858305931091, 0.8981809020042419, 0.5623518824577332, 0.3039661943912506, 0.5636547803878784, 0.6570242643356323, 0.8255555033683777, 0.8416927456855774, 0.5648221373558044, 0.46406176686286926, 0.7977301478385925, 0.847490131855011, 0.39193516969680786, 0.6075796484947205, 0.44903364777565, 0.2989813983440399, 0.5961335897445679, 0.9299393892288208, 0.7149813175201416, 0.29818645119667053, 0.7835896611213684, 0.5889742970466614, 0.40341001749038696, 0.8106220960617065, 0.7723848819732666, 0.5252392292022705, 0.8630457520484924, 0.5616899132728577, 0.8972155451774597, 0.826230525970459, 0.865437388420105, 0.7946452498435974, 0.5408777594566345, 0.5533812642097473, 0.888753354549408, 0.35721415281295776, 0.5077587962150574, 0.5470883250236511, 0.6425085067749023, 0.4149613678455353, 0.6050927639007568, 0.5335094332695007, 0.3942941725254059, 0.7346646189689636, 0.6915318965911865, 0.349696546792984, 0.8248189091682434, 0.6170130372047424, 0.4674537777900696, 0.6575040221214294, 0.8942016959190369, 0.8608326315879822, 0.899681806564331, 0.8647289276123047, 0.858323335647583, 0.8149261474609375, 0.8956928849220276, 0.8829122185707092, 0.8417165875434875, 0.6161927580833435, 0.9101014733314514, 0.8622835278511047, 0.818047821521759, 0.9295644760131836, 0.9144490957260132, 0.4012536406517029, 0.4739648997783661, 0.5327882766723633, 0.8872118592262268, 0.7572900652885437, 0.9401180744171143, 0.8683639168739319, 0.9276297688484192, 0.8929941654205322, 0.8926201462745667, 0.41274353861808777, 0.7553134560585022, 0.5861831307411194, 0.3860415518283844, 0.8087287545204163, 0.8861048817634583, 0.42405518889427185, 0.7992863655090332, 0.8720007538795471, 0.8809710144996643, 0.817959725856781, 0.9353610873222351, 0.837544858455658, 0.8445500731468201, 0.8595331311225891, 0.8689449429512024, 0.6921852231025696, 0.7366902232170105, 0.8517093658447266, 0.6095514297485352, 0.6478083729743958, 0.7507642507553101, 0.716144323348999, 0.6503995060920715, 0.8311834931373596, 0.5612900853157043, 0.6970852613449097, 0.5786941051483154, 0.8647862076759338, 0.7353612780570984, 0.6896225810050964, 0.4018409550189972, 0.689565896987915, 0.5099980235099792, 0.754436194896698, 0.9319900274276733, 0.7227582931518555, 0.7899767160415649, 0.8522248864173889, 0.5674837827682495, 0.8766948580741882, 0.9322350025177002, 0.4375576972961426, 0.8638659119606018, 0.3863486647605896, 0.91268390417099, 0.8512044548988342, 0.8488184213638306, 0.895340621471405, 0.5655409693717957, 0.8994914889335632, 0.4746232032775879, 0.5799911618232727, 0.297030508518219, 0.5418323278427124, 0.5188413262367249, 0.8953028321266174, 0.7839944362640381, 0.598232090473175, 0.5794670581817627, 0.8787451386451721, 0.6000708937644958, 0.42075663805007935, 0.8802372217178345, 0.39630386233329773, 0.6895635724067688, 0.9367141127586365, 0.721915066242218, 0.7332754731178284, 0.8135274648666382, 0.6885796189308167, 0.8230043649673462, 0.5497416257858276, 0.4640730321407318, 0.8248351216316223, 0.9002495408058167, 0.8595513105392456, 0.9397266507148743, 0.874323844909668, 0.8034916520118713, 0.4274585545063019, 0.884318470954895, 0.9313802123069763, 0.923482358455658, 0.9086737036705017, 0.8926413059234619, 0.4632668197154999, 0.8894039988517761, 0.4938696026802063, 0.30732253193855286, 0.9167993068695068, 0.5246438980102539, 0.9234734177589417, 0.3674063980579376, 0.8223252296447754, 0.9094212651252747, 0.5300855040550232, 0.45882660150527954, 0.8548395037651062, 0.9034847021102905, 0.5382521748542786, 0.9452663064002991, 0.5296531915664673, 0.8772598505020142, 0.441709965467453, 0.8265699148178101, 0.8177812695503235, 0.8511082530021667, 0.6848394870758057, 0.9001026749610901, 0.6235143542289734, 0.33241021633148193, 0.6265713572502136, 0.6511375308036804, 0.6440280675888062, 0.8584729433059692, 0.8714953064918518, 0.8904735445976257, 0.39757660031318665, 0.5245389342308044, 0.6086578965187073, 0.7985265851020813, 0.7946648001670837, 0.9245961308479309, 0.7589794993400574, 0.7357563376426697, 0.8787067532539368, 0.5787059664726257, 0.9421008825302124, 0.9459043145179749, 0.9661290049552917, 0.4011966586112976, 0.6190435290336609, 0.401276558637619, 0.5745280385017395, 0.9067540764808655, 0.5723782181739807, 0.7052896022796631, 0.8555031418800354, 0.8550761342048645, 0.763825535774231, 0.86775141954422, 0.7009186148643494, 0.8867212533950806, 0.3584691882133484, 0.8197040557861328, 0.8589053750038147, 0.9353556632995605, 0.8933730125427246, 0.4922317862510681, 0.8347448110580444, 0.9250115752220154, 0.895830512046814, 0.8897646069526672, 0.6983552575111389, 0.466580867767334, 0.44905850291252136, 0.9048035740852356, 0.9031677842140198, 0.913817822933197, 0.9618831276893616, 0.6867064237594604, 0.6317402124404907, 0.5000172257423401, 0.8234566450119019, 0.9307441711425781, 0.8638623356819153, 0.8395791053771973, 0.8887730240821838, 0.812896192073822, 0.9434510469436646, 0.737316370010376, 0.8472306132316589, 0.8965645432472229, 0.90436851978302, 0.9069620370864868, 0.8488189578056335, 0.7643826007843018, 0.8975039124488831, 0.8487326502799988, 0.8406388163566589, 0.9222498536109924, 0.38027423620224, 0.7227226495742798, 0.3603421151638031, 0.38168683648109436, 0.938956618309021, 0.8576497435569763, 0.9095489382743835, 0.707711398601532, 0.49496856331825256, 0.7671533823013306, 0.5696389675140381, 0.9276710748672485, 0.8503779768943787, 0.7521451115608215, 0.8758946061134338, 0.920380175113678, 0.7297032475471497, 0.8783565759658813, 0.6840120553970337, 0.8573582768440247, 0.7362571358680725, 0.8593714833259583, 0.8533653616905212, 0.9077380299568176, 0.9359117150306702, 0.4017626941204071, 0.8643010854721069, 0.8907518982887268, 0.622646152973175, 0.88803631067276, 0.36509570479393005, 0.8900870084762573, 0.6693536043167114, 0.8112010359764099, 0.6131483912467957, 0.900262176990509, 0.8624690175056458, 0.8959102630615234, 0.8446127772331238, 0.5922933220863342, 0.890762984752655, 0.7499790787696838, 0.8273302912712097, 0.5900433659553528, 0.7882125973701477, 0.68895024061203, 0.5789347887039185, 0.9042866230010986, 0.5929889678955078, 0.7105168700218201, 0.8636638522148132, 0.5664958953857422, 0.38304170966148376, 0.9206699728965759, 0.44240620732307434, 0.8562982678413391, 0.6846144199371338, 0.6068213582038879, 0.8234376311302185, 0.7692711353302002, 0.9286525249481201, 0.504366397857666, 0.9176183938980103, 0.9367641806602478, 0.9348583817481995, 0.8792341351509094, 0.8912619948387146, 0.888942539691925, 0.7933018803596497, 0.7984771132469177, 0.7453836798667908, 0.8774245381355286, 0.8738035559654236, 0.24236218631267548, 0.9395597577095032, 0.6563004851341248, 0.8271651864051819, 0.7276357412338257, 0.4019334018230438, 0.5489351153373718, 0.7674384117126465, 0.7205806374549866, 0.6981051564216614, 0.9683462381362915, 0.9058319926261902, 0.7611910700798035, 0.42759981751441956, 0.48911139369010925, 0.9102087616920471, 0.888910710811615, 0.8376023173332214, 0.8884796500205994, 0.6208954453468323, 0.8488864302635193, 0.8760619163513184, 0.4005625545978546, 0.6408048272132874, 0.889115035533905, 0.6639650464057922, 0.5590386986732483, 0.804036557674408, 0.6278210282325745, 0.886248767375946, 0.8802263140678406, 0.8846345543861389, 0.474905401468277, 0.8821924924850464, 0.8910052180290222, 0.7127225995063782, 0.3250502943992615, 0.9687204360961914, 0.5192174315452576, 0.8903196454048157, 0.38707229495048523, 0.8724247217178345, 0.6686330437660217, 0.8691133260726929, 0.5777769684791565, 0.4678764045238495, 0.9083805680274963, 0.39275917410850525, 0.9528184533119202, 0.4792843461036682, 0.5323198437690735, 0.7417475581169128, 0.6410521864891052, 0.9337966442108154, 0.9372538924217224, 0.9041313529014587, 0.4789253771305084, 0.8178095817565918, 0.4305649697780609, 0.5364086627960205, 0.7201692461967468, 0.7098143100738525, 0.745934784412384, 0.9187771677970886, 0.9050485491752625, 0.924904465675354, 0.8604676127433777, 0.8965871334075928, 0.9028595089912415, 0.7857714891433716, 0.6407270431518555, 0.6936743259429932, 0.46852728724479675, 0.7736276388168335, 0.7392883896827698, 0.8001620173454285, 0.8069387674331665, 0.9464151263237, 0.8494623303413391, 0.7415544986724854, 0.8991891145706177, 0.5605655908584595, 0.81682288646698, 0.8548527359962463, 0.8945215344429016, 0.49572399258613586, 0.9134359955787659, 0.37755778431892395, 0.3805251121520996, 0.847122311592102, 0.8274319767951965, 0.8461090326309204, 0.656500518321991, 0.9141045808792114, 0.5122241377830505, 0.4708835184574127, 0.6823486685752869, 0.6194412708282471, 0.8902532458305359, 0.8164324760437012, 0.4817142188549042, 0.5638074278831482, 0.7168385982513428, 0.5385830998420715, 0.9014204740524292, 0.890303909778595, 0.8108343482017517, 0.7234508991241455, 0.40521523356437683, 0.7049030661582947, 0.7431703209877014, 0.3899310827255249, 0.8205805420875549, 0.8526282906532288, 0.8757546544075012, 0.6086704134941101, 0.8398529887199402, 0.9321398138999939, 0.8519211411476135, 0.9004853367805481, 0.6696829199790955, 0.7955853343009949, 0.9150822758674622, 0.756260871887207, 0.8560190200805664, 0.7230649590492249, 0.86201012134552, 0.8705318570137024, 0.9069977402687073, 0.7068930268287659, 0.5435898900032043, 0.8178720474243164, 0.5878934264183044, 0.7036325335502625, 0.599159300327301, 0.6542484760284424, 0.5311949253082275, 0.5070430040359497, 0.33954259753227234, 0.9239363670349121, 0.7744632363319397, 0.3613009452819824, 0.899560272693634, 0.7456834316253662, 0.8599310517311096, 0.7799026966094971, 0.8540977239608765, 0.8878840208053589, 0.8504926562309265, 0.901738703250885, 0.6767076253890991, 0.7340357303619385, 0.8918190598487854, 0.9152668118476868, 0.7133933901786804, 0.5837709903717041, 0.8693206906318665, 0.9029330015182495, 0.8047354221343994, 0.8267982006072998, 0.6875321269035339, 0.729089081287384, 0.7952515482902527, 0.8276062607765198, 0.6380788683891296, 0.6835125088691711, 0.8872745633125305, 0.9072040319442749, 0.48400235176086426, 0.8597273230552673, 0.5171809196472168, 0.791801393032074, 0.5897698998451233, 0.4057357907295227, 0.49779561161994934, 0.5789204239845276, 0.8999122381210327, 0.8918595910072327, 0.7156046032905579, 0.6906952261924744, 0.8964806199073792, 0.6244644522666931, 0.9505607485771179, 0.9333612322807312, 0.8937672972679138, 0.8602109551429749, 0.9109063744544983, 0.80197674036026, 0.8442883491516113, 0.8585624694824219, 0.8656421303749084, 0.7840650677680969, 0.9072226881980896, 0.881671130657196, 0.7552981972694397, 0.8130368590354919, 0.7433966994285583, 0.7010137438774109, 0.4042656719684601, 0.87754225730896, 0.9281623959541321, 0.2544723451137543, 0.6260561347007751, 0.6352822780609131, 0.5172393918037415, 0.9594394564628601, 0.6656021475791931, 0.8936484456062317, 0.8356658220291138, 0.2929246425628662, 0.7364117503166199, 0.46639564633369446, 0.906359076499939, 0.35797935724258423, 0.970180094242096, 0.4470355212688446, 0.6484465599060059, 0.6631444692611694, 0.328926682472229, 0.9407150149345398, 0.2901988923549652, 0.45270293951034546, 0.46435460448265076, 0.35098734498023987, 0.5004364848136902, 0.7593388557434082, 0.9151543974876404, 0.919096052646637, 0.8301214575767517, 0.3856687545776367, 0.6217971444129944, 0.6715805530548096, 0.49152061343193054, 0.48276156187057495, 0.7850929498672485, 0.8181723952293396, 0.29525062441825867, 0.8944784998893738, 0.93215012550354, 0.7909568548202515, 0.5311083793640137, 0.9152585864067078, 0.632932722568512, 0.5920404195785522, 0.45993730425834656, 0.4983275234699249, 0.6173706650733948, 0.6122184991836548, 0.3259475529193878, 0.9533172249794006, 0.8924843668937683, 0.8469125628471375, 0.8858329057693481]}